2155 | confident (adjective): sure of yourself and not afraid | loc: selbstbewusst
  EN TS: That confident smile works.
  de TS: Dieses selbstbewusste Lächeln wirkt.
  EN FS: That nervous smile works.
  de FS: Dieses nervöse Lächeln wirkt.
  EN TP: a confident half-smile
  de TP: ein selbstbewusstes halbes Lächeln
  EN FP: a confident loud laugh
  de FP: ein selbstbewusstes lautes Lachen
2156 | horizon (noun): the far line where land seems to meet sky | loc: Horizont
  EN TS: The sun sits on the horizon.
  de TS: Die Sonne sitzt auf dem Horizont.
  EN FS: The moon sits on the horizon.
  de FS: Der Mond sitzt auf dem Horizont.
  EN TP: the sun on the horizon
  de TP: die Sonne am Horizont
  EN FP: a ship on the horizon
  de FP: ein Schiff am Horizont
2157 | india (noun): a large country in South Asia | loc: Indien
  EN TS: A baby from India wears gold.
  de TS: Ein Baby aus Indien trägt Gold.
  EN FS: A baby from India wears red.
  de FS: Ein Baby aus Indien trägt Rot.
  EN TP: a painting from India
  de TP: ein Gemälde aus Indien
  EN FP: a carpet from India
  de FP: ein Teppich aus Indien
2158 | headscarf (noun): a cloth wrapped around the head | loc: Kopftuch
  EN TS: Love the orange headscarf!
  de TS: Ich liebe das orange Kopftuch!
  EN FS: Love the blue headscarf!
  de FS: Ich liebe das blaue Kopftuch!
  EN TP: an orange headscarf
  de TP: ein oranges Kopftuch
  EN FP: taking off a headscarf
  de FP: ein Kopftuch abnehmen
2159 | majestic (adjective): grand and impressive, like a king | loc: majestätisch
  EN TS: The cat feels very majestic.
  de TS: Die Katze fühlt sich sehr majestätisch.
  EN FS: The dog feels very majestic.
  de FS: Der Hund fühlt sich sehr majestätisch.
  EN TP: a majestic cat
  de TP: eine majestätische Katze
  EN FP: a majestic lion
  de FP: ein majestätischer Löwe
2162 | ginger (adjective): having orange-red hair | loc: rothaarig
  EN TS: Her ginger hair looks perfect.
  de TS: Sie ist rothaarig und ihr Haar sieht perfekt aus.
  EN FS: Her black hair looks perfect.
  de FS: Sie ist schwarzhaarig und ihr Haar sieht perfekt aus.
  EN TP: long ginger hair in waves
  de TP: rothaarig mit langen Wellen
  EN FP: ginger hair in a bun
  de FP: rothaarig mit Dutt
2164 | woods (noun): an area of land covered with trees | loc: Wald
  EN TS: A path goes into the woods. Who wants to go first?
  de TS: Ein Weg führt in den Wald. Wer geht zuerst?
  EN FS: A river goes into the woods. Who wants to go first?
  de FS: Ein Fluss führt in den Wald. Wer geht zuerst?
  EN TP: a path through the woods
  de TP: ein Weg durch den Wald
  EN FP: a cabin in the woods
  de FP: eine Hütte im Wald
2172 | sports car (noun): a fast low car built for speed and fun | loc: Sportwagen
  EN TS: A sports car in a paint storm.
  de TS: Ein Sportwagen im Farbsturm.
  EN FS: A sports car in a snow storm.
  de FS: Ein Sportwagen im Schneesturm.
  EN TP: a dark-blue sports car
  de TP: ein dunkelblauer Sportwagen
  EN FP: a dark-blue family car
  de FP: ein dunkelblauer Familienwagen
2174 | bloom (verb): to open flowers; to be full of flowers | loc: blühen
  EN TS: A tree is blooming in snow!
  de TS: Ein Baum blüht im Schnee!
  EN FS: A tree is burning in snow!
  de FS: Ein Baum brennt im Schnee!
  EN TP: a tree blooming at night
  de TP: ein blühender Baum bei Nacht
  EN FP: flowers blooming in spring
  de FP: blühende Blumen im Frühling
2175 | midnight (noun): twelve o'clock at night | loc: Mitternacht
  EN TS: Midnight in the pine forest.
  de TS: Mitternacht im Kiefernwald.
  EN FS: Midnight in the desert.
  de FS: Mitternacht in der Wüste.
  EN TP: midnight under the stars
  de TP: Mitternacht unter den Sternen
  EN FP: a party at midnight
  de FP: eine Party um Mitternacht
2176 | aisle (noun): a narrow walkway between rows of shelves | loc: Gang
  EN TS: It is raining in the aisle!
  de TS: Es regnet im Gang!
  EN FS: It is snowing in the aisle!
  de FS: Es schneit im Gang!
  EN TP: a rainy library aisle
  de TP: ein verregneter Gang in der Bibliothek
  EN FP: a busy supermarket aisle
  de FP: ein voller Gang im Supermarkt
2177 | dj (noun): someone who plays and mixes recorded music | loc: DJ
  EN TS: Even the moon came for the DJ!
  de TS: Sogar der Mond kam für den DJ!
  EN FS: Even the sun came for the DJ!
  de FS: Sogar die Sonne kam für den DJ!
  EN TP: a DJ on the street
  de TP: ein DJ auf der Straße
  EN FP: a DJ in a club
  de FP: ein DJ im Club
2178 | peek (verb): to take a quick secret look from hiding | loc: spähen
  EN TS: Psst, two cats are peeking.
  de TS: Psst, zwei Katzen spähen hervor.
  EN FS: Psst, two dogs are peeking.
  de FS: Psst, zwei Hunde spähen hervor.
  EN TP: peeking behind leaves
  de TP: hinter Blättern hervorspähen
  EN FP: peeking through a window
  de FP: durch ein Fenster spähen
2181 | crowded (adjective): uncomfortably full of people | loc: überfüllt
  EN TS: The street is way too crowded.
  de TS: Die Straße ist krass überfüllt.
  EN FS: The street is way too empty.
  de FS: Die Straße ist krass leer.
  EN TP: a crowded neon street
  de TP: eine überfüllte Neonstraße
  EN FP: a crowded train carriage
  de FP: ein überfüllter Zugwaggon
2182 | hiker (noun): a person who walks long distances in nature | loc: Wanderer
  EN TS: The hiker has a red backpack.
  de TS: Der Wanderer hat einen roten Rucksack.
  EN FS: The hiker has a blue backpack.
  de FS: Der Wanderer hat einen blauen Rucksack.
  EN TP: a hiker on a ledge
  de TP: ein Wanderer auf einem Felsvorsprung
  EN FP: a hiker in a tent
  de FP: ein Wanderer im Zelt
2184 | roar (verb): to make a loud, deep angry cry | loc: brüllen
  EN TS: The tiger is roaring!
  de TS: Der Tiger brüllt!
  EN FS: The lion is roaring!
  de FS: Der Löwe brüllt!
  EN TP: a roaring tiger
  de TP: ein brüllender Tiger
  EN FP: a sleeping tiger
  de FP: ein schlafender Tiger
2185 | pianist (noun): a person who plays the piano | loc: Pianist
  EN TS: The pianist has blonde hair.
  de TS: Der Pianist hat blonde Haare.
  EN FS: The pianist has black hair.
  de FS: Der Pianist hat schwarze Haare.
  EN TP: a pianist at the piano
  de TP: ein Pianist am Klavier
  EN FP: a pianist at a keyboard
  de FP: ein Pianist am Keyboard
2186 | thorn (noun): a sharp spike growing on a plant stem | loc: Dorn
  EN TS: Jesus wears a crown of thorns.
  de TS: Jesus trägt eine Krone aus Dornen.
  EN FS: Jesus wears a crown of gold.
  de FS: Jesus trägt eine Krone aus Gold.
  EN TP: a crown of thorns
  de TP: eine Krone aus Dornen
  EN FP: a rose with thorns
  de FP: eine Rose mit Dornen
2187 | buddha (noun): the founder of Buddhism, shown meditating | loc: Buddha
  EN TS: Buddha is meditating.
  de TS: Buddha meditiert.
  EN FS: Buddha is dancing.
  de FS: Buddha tanzt.
  EN TP: Buddha meditating
  de TP: Buddha beim Meditieren
  EN FP: Buddha lying down
  de FP: Buddha im Liegen
2188 | cry (verb): to shed tears because of sadness or pain | loc: weinen
  EN TS: The boy is crying, Mom isn't.
  de TS: Der Junge weint, Mama nicht.
  EN FS: The boy is singing, Mom isn't.
  de FS: Der Junge singt, Mama nicht.
  EN TP: crying on a bike
  de TP: weinen auf dem Fahrrad
  EN FP: crying in bed
  de FP: weinen im Bett
2189 | fall overboard (phrase): to fall off a boat into the water | loc: über Bord gehen
  EN TS: Someone is falling overboard!
  de TS: Jemand geht über Bord!
  EN FS: Someone is diving overboard!
  de FS: Jemand springt über Bord!
  EN TP: falling overboard backwards
  de TP: rückwärts über Bord gehen
  EN FP: falling asleep in the boat
  de FP: im Boot einschlafen
2190 | villain (noun): an evil character in a story or film | loc: der Bösewicht
  EN TS: This villain has flaming eyes.
  de TS: Dieser Bösewicht hat flammende Augen.
  EN FS: This villain has blue eyes.
  de FS: Dieser Bösewicht hat blaue Augen.
  EN TP: a villain in burning ruins
  de TP: ein Bösewicht in brennenden Ruinen
  EN FP: a villain in a castle
  de FP: ein Bösewicht in einer Burg
2191 | android (noun): a robot built to look like a human | loc: Android
  EN TS: The android has a human face.
  de TS: Der Android hat ein menschliches Gesicht.
  EN FS: The android has a long beard.
  de FS: Der Android hat einen langen Bart.
  EN TP: a glowing female android
  de TP: ein leuchtender weiblicher Android
  EN FP: an android in a kitchen
  de FP: ein Android in der Küche
2192 | flask (noun): a narrow-necked glass container for liquids | loc: Kolben
  EN TS: Harry Potter would love these flasks.
  de TS: Harry Potter würde diese Kolben lieben.
  EN FS: Harry Potter would love these brooms.
  de FS: Harry Potter würde diese Besen lieben.
  EN TP: glowing glass flasks
  de TP: leuchtende Glaskolben
  EN FP: a thermos flask
  de FP: eine Thermoskanne
2194 | tropical (adjective): from the hot wet regions near the equator | loc: tropisch
  EN TS: Tropical leaves are big. Wow.
  de TS: Tropische Blätter sind groß. Wow.
  EN FS: Tropical leaves are tiny. Wow.
  de FS: Tropische Blätter sind winzig. Wow.
  EN TP: dense tropical leaves
  de TP: dichte tropische Blätter
  EN FP: a tropical beach
  de FP: ein tropischer Strand
2195 | watercolor (noun): water-based paint, and pictures made with it | loc: das Aquarell
  EN TS: The watercolor is dripping.
  de TS: Das Aquarell tropft.
  EN FS: The oil paint is dripping.
  de FS: Die Ölfarbe tropft.
  EN TP: a watercolor portrait
  de TP: ein Porträt in Aquarell
  EN FP: a watercolor landscape
  de FP: eine Landschaft in Aquarell
2199 | delicate (adjective): fine, soft and easily damaged | loc: zart
  EN TS: Delicate roses everywhere!
  de TS: Überall zarte Rosen!
  EN FS: Delicate tulips everywhere!
  de FS: Überall zarte Tulpen!
  EN TP: delicate pink roses
  de TP: zarte rosa Rosen
  EN FP: a delicate glass vase
  de FP: eine zarte Glasvase
2200 | elegant (adjective): graceful and stylish to look at | loc: elegant
  EN TS: She looks elegant in her gown.
  de TS: Sie sieht in ihrem Abendkleid elegant aus.
  EN FS: She looks elegant in her coat.
  de FS: Sie sieht in ihrem Mantel elegant aus.
  EN TP: an elegant flowing gown
  de TP: ein elegantes fließendes Kleid
  EN FP: an elegant black suit
  de FP: ein eleganter schwarzer Anzug
2201 | orange (adjective): having the color between red and yellow | loc: orange
  EN TS: Her orange armour is so cool!
  de TS: Ihre orange Rüstung ist so cool!
  EN FS: Her pink armour is so cool!
  de FS: Ihre rosa Rüstung ist so cool!
  EN TP: orange hair and armour
  de TP: orange Haare und Rüstung
  EN FP: an orange in her hand
  de FP: eine Orange in ihrer Hand
2202 | smart (adjective): neat and well-dressed, not scruffy | loc: schick
  EN TS: His white blazer looks smart.
  de TS: Sein weißer Blazer sieht schick aus.
  EN FS: His red blazer looks smart.
  de FS: Sein roter Blazer sieht schick aus.
  EN TP: a smart white blazer
  de TP: ein schicker weißer Blazer
  EN FP: a smart dark suit
  de FP: ein schicker dunkler Anzug
2204 | lamb (noun): a baby sheep | loc: Lamm
  EN TS: He is holding a lamb.
  de TS: Er hält ein Lamm.
  EN FS: He is holding a dog.
  de FS: Er hält einen Hund.
  EN TP: a lamb in his arms
  de TP: ein Lamm in seinen Armen
  EN FP: a lamb in a field
  de FP: ein Lamm auf der Weide
2207 | point (verb): to indicate a direction or thing with your finger | loc: zeigen
  EN TS: The robot hand is pointing.
  de TS: Die Roboterhand zeigt auf etwas.
  EN FS: The robot hand is waving.
  de FS: Die Roboterhand winkt.
  EN TP: pointing at a screen
  de TP: auf einen Bildschirm zeigen
  EN FP: pointing at the sky
  de FP: in den Himmel zeigen
2208 | pink (adjective): a light shade of red | loc: rosa
  EN TS: Her hair is bright pink.
  de TS: Ihr Haar ist leuchtend rosa.
  EN FS: Her hair is bright green.
  de FS: Ihr Haar ist leuchtend grün.
  EN TP: bright pink hair
  de TP: leuchtend rosa Haare
  EN FP: a bright pink dress
  de FP: ein leuchtend rosa Kleid
2211 | trident (noun): a spear with three sharp points | loc: der Dreizack
  EN TS: Guess who has a trident? The sea god.
  de TS: Rate mal, wer einen Dreizack hat? Der Meeresgott.
  EN FS: Guess who has a hammer? The sea god.
  de FS: Rate mal, wer einen Hammer hat? Der Meeresgott.
  EN TP: a god with a trident
  de TP: ein Gott mit Dreizack
  EN FP: a trident in the sand
  de FP: ein Dreizack im Sand
2212 | stripes (noun): long thin lines of a different color | loc: Streifen
  EN TS: Nice stripes, tiger!
  de TS: Krasse Streifen, Tiger!
  EN FS: Nice spots, tiger!
  de FS: Krasse Flecken, Tiger!
  EN TP: a tiger with black stripes
  de TP: ein Tiger mit schwarzen Streifen
  EN FP: a zebra with black stripes
  de FP: ein Zebra mit schwarzen Streifen
2213 | ram (noun): a male sheep with big curved horns | loc: Widder
  EN TS: Fact: rams have curly horns.
  de TS: Fakt: Widder haben gedrehte Hörner.
  EN FS: Fact: rams have flat horns.
  de FS: Fakt: Widder haben flache Hörner.
  EN TP: a ram with curly horns
  de TP: ein Widder mit gedrehten Hörnern
  EN FP: a ram eating grass
  de FP: ein grasender Widder
2214 | through (preposition): from one side of an opening to the other | loc: durch
  EN TS: I can see a castle through it.
  de TS: Durch das Loch sehe ich eine Burg.
  EN FS: I can see a church through it.
  de FS: Durch das Loch sehe ich eine Kirche.
  EN TP: looking through a rock hole
  de TP: durch ein Felsloch schauen
  EN FP: looking through a window
  de FP: durch ein Fenster schauen
2216 | altar (noun): a raised table where people pray | loc: Altar
  EN TS: She is praying at an altar.
  de TS: Sie betet an einem Altar.
  EN FS: She is singing at an altar.
  de FS: Sie singt an einem Altar.
  EN TP: praying at a candlelit altar
  de TP: an einem Altar mit Kerzen beten
  EN FP: getting married at the altar
  de FP: vor dem Altar heiraten
2217 | spell (noun): words or power used to make magic happen | loc: Zauberspruch | translator note: FP pun "spell of bad weather" does not travel; replaced by a similar wrong magic label
  EN TS: She's casting a spell. Cool.
  de TS: Sie spricht einen Zauberspruch. Cool.
  EN FS: She's casting a net. Cool.
  de FS: Sie wirft ein Netz aus. Cool.
  EN TP: casting a magic spell
  de TP: einen Zauberspruch sprechen
  EN FP: a spell of bad weather
  de FP: einen Zaubertrank brauen
2218 | circuit (noun): the path electricity follows on a board | loc: Schaltkreis | translator note: FP pun "race circuit" lost in German; kept as wrong label
  EN TS: Circuits are all around him.
  de TS: Schaltkreise sind überall um ihn herum.
  EN FS: Flowers are all around him.
  de FS: Blumen sind überall um ihn herum.
  EN TP: glowing circuit lines
  de TP: leuchtende Linien von Schaltkreisen
  EN FP: a race circuit
  de FP: eine Rennstrecke
2220 | count (verb): to find out the number or amount of something | loc: zählen
  EN TS: He is counting the money carefully.
  de TS: Er zählt das Geld sorgfältig.
  EN FS: He is counting the coins carefully.
  de FS: Er zählt die Münzen sorgfältig.
  EN TP: counting a stack of bills
  de TP: einen Stapel Scheine zählen
  EN FP: counting down the seconds
  de FP: die Sekunden herunterzählen
2224 | hold hands (phrase): to walk or stand with your fingers joined | loc: Händchen halten
  EN TS: They are holding hands.
  de TS: Sie halten Händchen.
  EN FS: They are shaking hands.
  de FS: Sie schütteln sich die Hände.
  EN TP: holding hands in the rain
  de TP: Händchen halten im Regen
  EN FP: holding hands in the sun
  de FP: Händchen halten in der Sonne
2225 | soaked (adjective): completely wet, right through | loc: durchnässt
  EN TS: Poor girl, her hair is soaked.
  de TS: Das arme Mädchen, ihr Haar ist völlig durchnässt.
  EN FS: Poor girl, her hair is dry.
  de FS: Das arme Mädchen, ihr Haar ist völlig trocken.
  EN TP: soaked in heavy rain
  de TP: durchnässt vom Starkregen
  EN FP: soaked in hot water
  de FP: durchnässt von heißem Wasser
2226 | bracelet (noun): a band wrapped around the wrist | loc: Armband | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He has golden bracelets.
  de TS: Er trägt goldene Armbänder.
  EN FS: He has golden gloves.
  de FS: Er trägt goldene Handschuhe.
  EN TP: golden bracelets on wrists
  de TP: goldene Armbänder an den Handgelenken
  EN FP: a bracelet in a shop
  de FP: ein Armband im Laden
2227 | glance (verb): to look at something quickly | loc: kurz blicken
  EN TS: She is glancing back. At you?
  de TS: Sie blickt kurz zurück. Zu dir?
  EN FS: She is glancing down. At you?
  de FS: Sie blickt kurz nach unten. Zu dir?
  EN TP: glancing over her shoulder
  de TP: kurz über die Schulter blicken
  EN FP: glancing at her phone
  de FP: kurz aufs Handy blicken
2228 | above (preposition): higher than something, over it | loc: über
  EN TS: She is sitting above the city.
  de TS: Sie sitzt hoch über der Stadt.
  EN FS: She is sitting above the sea.
  de FS: Sie sitzt hoch über dem Meer.
  EN TP: high above the city
  de TP: hoch über der Stadt
  EN FP: above the clouds
  de FP: über den Wolken
2231 | sphinx (noun): an Egyptian statue: human head, lion body | loc: Sphinx
  EN TS: A giant golden sphinx.
  de TS: Eine riesige goldene Sphinx.
  EN FS: A giant silver sphinx.
  de FS: Eine riesige silberne Sphinx.
  EN TP: a golden sphinx statue
  de TP: eine goldene Sphinx-Statue
  EN FP: a sphinx cat sleeping
  de FP: eine schlafende Sphinx-Katze
2232 | peaceful (adjective): not disturbed by fighting or trouble | loc: friedlich
  EN TS: The Buddha looks peaceful.
  de TS: Der Buddha wirkt friedlich.
  EN FS: The Buddha looks angry.
  de FS: Der Buddha wirkt wütend.
  EN TP: a peaceful golden Buddha
  de TP: ein friedlicher goldener Buddha
  EN FP: a peaceful golden temple
  de FP: ein friedlicher goldener Tempel
2233 | baseball (noun): a game where you hit a ball with a bat and run | loc: Baseball
  EN TS: She has two baseball gloves.
  de TS: Sie hat zwei Baseballhandschuhe.
  EN FS: She has two baseball bats.
  de FS: Sie hat zwei Baseballschläger.
  EN TP: baseball gloves in both hands
  de TP: Baseballhandschuhe in beiden Händen
  EN FP: baseball on television
  de FP: Baseball im Fernsehen
2234 | muscles (noun): the strong parts that move your body | loc: Muskeln
  EN TS: The warrior has big muscles.
  de TS: Der Krieger hat große Muskeln.
  EN FS: The warrior has a big shield.
  de FS: Der Krieger hat einen großen Schild.
  EN TP: a warrior's big muscles
  de TP: die großen Muskeln eines Kriegers
  EN FP: a warrior's big shield
  de FP: der große Schild eines Kriegers
2235 | profile (noun): the side view of a person's face | loc: Profil
  EN TS: He is shown in full profile.
  de TS: Er ist im vollen Profil zu sehen.
  EN FS: He is shown from the back.
  de FS: Er ist von hinten zu sehen.
  EN TP: a man in full profile
  de TP: ein Mann im Profil
  EN FP: a profile picture online
  de FP: ein Profilbild im Netz
2236 | palace (noun): a large grand house where a king lives | loc: Palast
  EN TS: Palace under a huge moon. Wow!
  de TS: Ein Palast unter riesigem Mond. Wow!
  EN FS: Palace under a huge sun. Wow!
  de FS: Ein Palast unter riesiger Sonne. Wow!
  EN TP: a palace in the mountains
  de TP: ein Palast in den Bergen
  EN FP: a palace in the desert
  de FP: ein Palast in der Wüste
2237 | shiny (adjective): reflecting light | loc: glänzend
  EN TS: Look at this shiny yellow car!
  de TS: Schau dir dieses glänzende gelbe Auto an!
  EN FS: Look at this shiny red car!
  de FS: Schau dir dieses glänzende rote Auto an!
  EN TP: a shiny yellow car
  de TP: ein glänzendes gelbes Auto
  EN FP: a shiny yellow bus
  de FP: ein glänzender gelber Bus
2238 | mosque (noun): a building where Muslims go to pray | loc: Moschee
  EN TS: The mosque has many domes.
  de TS: Die Moschee hat viele Kuppeln.
  EN FS: The mosque has one dome.
  de FS: Die Moschee hat eine Kuppel.
  EN TP: a grand mosque with domes
  de TP: eine große Moschee mit Kuppeln
  EN FP: a mosque in the desert
  de FP: eine Moschee in der Wüste
2242 | flock (noun): a group of birds together | loc: Schwarm | translator note: FP "flock of sheep" = Herde in German; used bees to keep Schwarm
  EN TS: The flock has zero free seats.
  de TS: Der Schwarm hat null freie Plätze.
  EN FS: The flock has many free seats.
  de FS: Der Schwarm hat viele freie Plätze.
  EN TP: a flock of small birds
  de TP: ein Schwarm kleiner Vögel
  EN FP: a flock of sheep
  de FP: ein Schwarm Bienen
2245 | overgrown (adjective): covered by plants growing out of control | loc: überwuchert
  EN TS: It's just a bit overgrown.
  de TS: Ist nur ein bisschen überwuchert.
  EN FS: It's just a bit snowy.
  de FS: Ist nur ein bisschen verschneit.
  EN TP: an overgrown cottage
  de TP: ein überwuchertes Häuschen
  EN FP: an overgrown lawn
  de FP: ein überwucherter Rasen
2246 | miniature (adjective): a very small copy of something bigger | loc: miniaturhaft
  EN TS: The display features a miniature cottage.
  de TS: Die Vitrine präsentiert ein miniaturhaftes Häuschen.
  EN FS: The display features a miniature castle.
  de FS: Die Vitrine präsentiert ein miniaturhaftes Schloss.
  EN TP: a miniature night garden
  de TP: ein miniaturhafter Nachtgarten
  EN FP: a miniature train set
  de FP: eine Miniatur-Eisenbahn
2247 | scotland (noun): a country in the north of Great Britain | loc: Schottland
  EN TS: Scotland has a lonely church.
  de TS: Schottland hat eine einsame Kirche.
  EN FS: Scotland has a lonely castle.
  de FS: Schottland hat eine einsame Burg.
  EN TP: a church in Scotland
  de TP: eine Kirche in Schottland
  EN FP: a castle in Scotland
  de FP: eine Burg in Schottland
2248 | graceful (adjective): moving in a smooth, beautiful, elegant way | loc: anmutig
  EN TS: She is floating gracefully.
  de TS: Sie schwebt anmutig.
  EN FS: She is dancing gracefully.
  de FS: Sie tanzt anmutig.
  EN TP: floating gracefully in the air
  de TP: anmutig in der Luft schweben
  EN FP: a graceful dance on stage
  de FP: ein anmutiger Tanz auf der Bühne
2249 | steampunk (adjective): a fantasy style of old brass machines and gears | loc: Steampunk
  EN TS: A steampunk city of gears.
  de TS: Eine Steampunk-Stadt aus Zahnrädern.
  EN FS: A steampunk city of glass.
  de FS: Eine Steampunk-Stadt aus Glas.
  EN TP: brass steampunk towers
  de TP: Steampunk-Türme aus Messing
  EN FP: a steampunk costume party
  de FP: eine Steampunk-Kostümparty
2250 | gaze (verb): to look at something steadily for a long time | loc: starren
  EN TS: She is gazing at the city.
  de TS: Sie starrt auf die Stadt.
  EN FS: She is gazing at the sea.
  de FS: Sie starrt aufs Meer.
  EN TP: gazing at a rainy city
  de TP: auf eine verregnete Stadt starren
  EN FP: gazing at a starry sky
  de FP: in den Sternenhimmel starren
2251 | robe (noun): a long loose piece of clothing | loc: Gewand
  EN TS: Heaven's dress code: a white robe.
  de TS: Dresscode im Himmel: ein weißes Gewand.
  EN FS: Heaven's dress code: a black robe.
  de FS: Dresscode im Himmel: ein schwarzes Gewand.
  EN TP: a long white robe
  de TP: ein langes weißes Gewand
  EN FP: a robe with a hood
  de FP: ein Gewand mit Kapuze
2254 | frozen (adjective): turned to ice or completely covered in ice | loc: gefroren
  EN TS: A frozen palace. Hi, Elsa!
  de TS: Ein gefrorener Palast. Hi, Elsa!
  EN FS: A frozen lake. Hi, Elsa!
  de FS: Ein gefrorener See. Hi, Elsa!
  EN TP: a frozen snowy palace
  de TP: ein gefrorener Schneepalast
  EN FP: frozen peas in a bag
  de FP: gefrorene Erbsen in der Tüte
2256 | mechanical (adjective): made of machine parts and worked by machine | loc: mechanisch
  EN TS: Her legs are fully mechanical.
  de TS: Ihre Beine sind komplett mechanisch.
  EN FS: Her legs are fully wooden.
  de FS: Ihre Beine sind komplett aus Holz.
  EN TP: mechanical arms and legs
  de TP: mechanische Arme und Beine
  EN FP: a mechanical watch
  de FP: eine mechanische Uhr
2257 | eyebrows (noun): the lines of hair above your eyes | loc: Augenbrauen
  EN TS: Her eyebrows are very dark.
  de TS: Ihre Augenbrauen sind sehr dunkel.
  EN FS: Her eyebrows are very light.
  de FS: Ihre Augenbrauen sind sehr hell.
  EN TP: thick dark eyebrows
  de TP: dichte dunkle Augenbrauen
  EN FP: thin blond eyebrows
  de FP: dünne blonde Augenbrauen
2258 | spire (noun): a tall thin pointed top on a tower | loc: Turmspitze
  EN TS: The church has a tall spire.
  de TS: Die Kirche hat eine hohe Turmspitze.
  EN FS: The church has a round dome.
  de FS: Die Kirche hat eine runde Kuppel.
  EN TP: a tall church spire
  de TP: eine hohe Turmspitze
  EN FP: a spire on a castle
  de FP: eine Turmspitze auf einer Burg
2259 | lagoon (noun): a calm pool of sea water behind rocks | loc: Lagune
  EN TS: Take me to this lagoon now!
  de TS: Bring mich sofort zu dieser Lagune!
  EN FS: Take me to this glacier now!
  de FS: Bring mich sofort zu diesem Gletscher!
  EN TP: a turquoise lagoon with palms
  de TP: eine türkise Lagune mit Palmen
  EN FP: a frozen lagoon in winter
  de FP: eine gefrorene Lagune im Winter
2260 | rowboat (noun): a small open boat moved with oars | loc: Ruderboot
  EN TS: Poor rowboat, nobody wants it.
  de TS: Armes Ruderboot, keiner will es.
  EN FS: Poor ship, nobody wants it.
  de FS: Armes Schiff, keiner will es.
  EN TP: an empty wooden rowboat
  de TP: ein leeres Ruderboot aus Holz
  EN FP: a rowboat full of people
  de FP: ein Ruderboot voller Menschen
2262 | connect (verb): to join two people or things together | loc: verbinden
  EN TS: Dots and lines connect them.
  de TS: Punkte und Linien verbinden sie.
  EN FS: Dots and lines divide them.
  de FS: Punkte und Linien trennen sie.
  EN TP: lines connecting two people
  de TP: Linien verbinden zwei Menschen
  EN FP: a cable connecting a phone
  de FP: ein Kabel verbindet ein Handy
2268 | tightrope (noun): a rope stretched high for acrobats to cross | loc: Drahtseil
  EN TS: She is on a tightrope. No net!
  de TS: Sie steht auf einem Drahtseil. Ohne Netz!
  EN FS: She is on a ladder. No net!
  de FS: Sie steht auf einer Leiter. Ohne Netz!
  EN TP: balancing on a tightrope
  de TP: auf einem Drahtseil balancieren
  EN FP: a circus tightrope act
  de FP: eine Drahtseilnummer im Zirkus
2269 | blouse (noun): a loose light shirt worn by women | loc: Bluse
  EN TS: Her blouse is loose and white.
  de TS: Ihre Bluse ist locker und weiß.
  EN FS: Her dress is loose and white.
  de FS: Ihr Kleid ist locker und weiß.
  EN TP: a loose white blouse
  de TP: eine lockere weiße Bluse
  EN FP: a tight black blouse
  de FP: eine enge schwarze Bluse
2271 | corridor (noun): a long narrow passage inside a building | loc: Korridor
  EN TS: She is chilling in a corridor.
  de TS: Sie chillt in einem Korridor.
  EN FS: She is chilling in a kitchen.
  de FS: Sie chillt in einer Küche.
  EN TP: a spaceship corridor
  de TP: ein Korridor im Raumschiff
  EN FP: a hospital corridor
  de FP: ein Korridor im Krankenhaus
2273 | jeans (noun): trousers made of strong blue cotton | loc: Jeans
  EN TS: Ripped jeans, full denim look.
  de TS: Zerrissene Jeans, alles in Denim.
  EN FS: Ripped jeans, full black look.
  de FS: Zerrissene Jeans, alles in Schwarz.
  EN TP: heavily ripped blue jeans
  de TP: stark zerrissene blaue Jeans
  EN FP: ironing blue jeans
  de FP: blaue Jeans bügeln
2274 | lace (noun): fine cloth with open patterns of threads | loc: Spitze | translator note: FP pun "shoe lace" does not travel (Spitze vs Schnürsenkel); kept the shoelace label
  EN TS: That lace collar is so fancy!
  de TS: Dieser Kragen aus Spitze ist so edel!
  EN FS: That fur collar is so fancy!
  de FS: Dieser Kragen aus Pelz ist so edel!
  EN TP: an ornate lace collar
  de TP: ein verzierter Kragen aus Spitze
  EN FP: tying a shoe lace
  de FP: einen Schnürsenkel binden
2275 | outfit (noun): the set of clothes worn together | loc: Outfit
  EN TS: Nice outfit, big sneakers!
  de TS: Cooles Outfit, riesige Sneaker!
  EN FS: Nice outfit, tiny sneakers!
  de FS: Cooles Outfit, winzige Sneaker!
  EN TP: a street style outfit
  de TP: ein Streetstyle-Outfit
  EN FP: an outfit for a wedding
  de FP: ein Outfit für eine Hochzeit
2278 | look up (phrase): to raise your eyes to see something above | loc: nach oben schauen | translator note: FP pun "look up a word" lost; used nachschlagen
  EN TS: He is looking up at the sky.
  de TS: Er schaut nach oben in den Himmel.
  EN FS: He is looking up at a plane.
  de FS: Er schaut nach oben zu einem Flugzeug.
  EN TP: to look up at clouds
  de TP: nach oben zu den Wolken schauen
  EN FP: to look up a word
  de FP: ein Wort nachschlagen
2280 | embrace (verb): to put your arms around someone | loc: umarmen | translator note: FP "embrace a new idea" unnatural in German; replaced by another wrong embrace
  EN TS: He is embracing her at sunset.
  de TS: Er umarmt sie bei Sonnenuntergang.
  EN FS: He is embracing her in a car.
  de FS: Er umarmt sie im Auto.
  EN TP: embracing on a sailing boat
  de TP: sich auf einem Segelboot umarmen
  EN FP: embracing a new idea
  de FP: einen Baum umarmen
2282 | sailing (noun): the sport of travelling on a boat with wind power | loc: das Segeln
  EN TS: Sailing at sunset. So chill.
  de TS: Segeln bei Sonnenuntergang. So chill.
  EN FS: Surfing at sunset. So chill.
  de FS: Surfen bei Sonnenuntergang. So chill.
  EN TP: sailing at sunset
  de TP: Segeln bei Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: sailing in a storm
  de FP: Segeln im Sturm
2284 | hairstyle (noun): the way someone's hair is cut and arranged | loc: Frisur
  EN TS: Feathers? Bold hairstyle.
  de TS: Federn? Mutige Frisur.
  EN FS: Pearls? Bold hairstyle.
  de FS: Perlen? Mutige Frisur.
  EN TP: a hairstyle of feathers
  de TP: eine Frisur aus Federn
  EN FP: a short hairstyle
  de FP: eine kurze Frisur
2285 | sweatshirt (noun): a warm soft long-sleeved top, often oversized | loc: Sweatshirt
  EN TS: Her sweatshirt is huge.
  de TS: Ihr Sweatshirt ist riesig.
  EN FS: Her backpack is huge.
  de FS: Ihr Rucksack ist riesig.
  EN TP: a big blue sweatshirt
  de TP: ein großes blaues Sweatshirt
  EN FP: a sweatshirt on a chair
  de FP: ein Sweatshirt auf einem Stuhl
2287 | grief (noun): deep sadness, especially after losing someone | loc: Trauer
  EN TS: He is sitting alone in grief.
  de TS: Er sitzt allein in seiner Trauer.
  EN FS: He is sitting alone in a car.
  de FS: Er sitzt allein in einem Auto.
  EN TP: grief in a dark garden
  de TP: Trauer in einem dunklen Garten
  EN FP: grief at a funeral
  de FP: Trauer bei einer Beerdigung
2288 | crop top (noun): a short top that leaves the stomach bare | loc: Crop-Top
  EN TS: Crop top at the marina.
  de TS: Crop-Top am Jachthafen.
  EN FS: Crop top at the ski resort.
  de FS: Crop-Top im Skigebiet.
  EN TP: a black crop top
  de TP: ein schwarzes Crop-Top
  EN FP: a white crop top
  de FP: ein weißes Crop-Top
2291 | asteroid (noun): a rock that flies through space | loc: Asteroid
  EN TS: Just a few asteroids. Relax.
  de TS: Nur ein paar Asteroiden. Entspann dich.
  EN FS: Just a few birds. Relax.
  de FS: Nur ein paar Vögel. Entspann dich.
  EN TP: floating asteroids
  de TP: schwebende Asteroiden
  EN FP: an asteroid hitting Earth
  de FP: ein Asteroid trifft die Erde
2295 | sleeve (noun): the part of a garment that covers the arm | loc: Ärmel
  EN TS: Those sleeves are enormous!
  de TS: Diese Ärmel sind riesig!
  EN FS: Those boots are enormous!
  de FS: Diese Stiefel sind riesig!
  EN TP: wide white sleeves
  de TP: weite weiße Ärmel
  EN FP: short black sleeves
  de FP: kurze schwarze Ärmel
2296 | floral (adjective): decorated with a flower pattern | loc: geblümt
  EN TS: Her floral dress matches the wall!
  de TS: Ihr geblümtes Kleid passt zur Wand!
  EN FS: Her striped dress matches the wall!
  de FS: Ihr gestreiftes Kleid passt zur Wand!
  EN TP: an orange floral dress
  de TP: ein oranges geblümtes Kleid
  EN FP: a floral beach shirt
  de FP: ein geblümtes Strandhemd
2297 | shore (noun): the land along the edge of the sea or a lake | loc: Ufer
  EN TS: Waves are hitting the shore.
  de TS: Wellen schlagen ans Ufer.
  EN FS: Waves are hitting the boat.
  de FS: Wellen schlagen ans Boot.
  EN TP: palm trees on the shore
  de TP: Palmen am Ufer
  EN FP: a boat on the shore
  de FP: ein Boot am Ufer
2300 | on fire (phrase): burning with flames | loc: in Flammen
  EN TS: The guitar is on fire!
  de TS: Die Gitarre steht in Flammen!
  EN FS: The piano is on fire!
  de FS: Das Klavier steht in Flammen!
  EN TP: a guitar on fire
  de TP: eine Gitarre in Flammen
  EN FP: a house on fire
  de FP: ein Haus in Flammen
2301 | launch (verb): to send a rocket up into space | loc: starten
  EN TS: The shuttle is being launched.
  de TS: Das Space Shuttle startet.
  EN FS: The plane is being launched.
  de FS: Das Flugzeug startet.
  EN TP: launching a space shuttle
  de TP: ein Space Shuttle starten
  EN FP: launching a new product
  de FP: ein neues Produkt starten
2302 | weightless (adjective): floating freely because gravity does not pull | loc: schwerelos
  EN TS: He is weightless and relaxed.
  de TS: Er ist schwerelos und entspannt.
  EN FS: He is weightless and scared.
  de FS: Er ist schwerelos und verängstigt.
  EN TP: a weightless astronaut
  de TP: ein schwereloser Astronaut
  EN FP: a weightless feather
  de FP: eine schwerelose Feder
2305 | rocky (adjective): covered with rocks and stones | loc: felsig
  EN TS: A rocky road to a lighthouse.
  de TS: Ein felsiger Weg zu einem Leuchtturm.
  EN FS: A rocky road to a castle.
  de FS: Ein felsiger Weg zu einer Burg.
  EN TP: a rocky headland
  de TP: eine felsige Landzunge
  EN FP: a rocky beach with sunbeds
  de FP: ein felsiger Strand mit Liegen
2306 | countryside (noun): land with fields and villages, away from towns | loc: Land
  EN TS: The countryside never ends.
  de TS: Das Land nimmt kein Ende.
  EN FS: The city never ends.
  de FS: Die Stadt nimmt kein Ende.
  EN TP: kids in the countryside
  de TP: Kinder auf dem Land
  EN FP: kids leaving the countryside
  de FP: Kinder verlassen das Land
2308 | viking (noun): a warrior sailor from old Scandinavia | loc: der Wikinger
  EN TS: The viking is holding a blade.
  de TS: Der Wikinger hält eine Klinge.
  EN FS: The viking is holding an axe.
  de FS: Der Wikinger hält eine Axt.
  EN TP: a viking in fur
  de TP: ein Wikinger in Fell
  EN FP: a viking on a ship
  de FP: ein Wikinger auf einem Schiff
2310 | melody (noun): a line of musical notes that makes a tune | loc: Melodie
  EN TS: A melody rises from the piano.
  de TS: Eine Melodie steigt aus dem Klavier.
  EN FS: A melody rises from the drum.
  de FS: Eine Melodie steigt aus der Trommel.
  EN TP: a golden melody rising
  de TP: eine goldene Melodie steigt auf
  EN FP: a golden melody falling
  de FP: eine goldene Melodie sinkt herab
2311 | stained glass (noun): coloured glass pieces forming a picture | loc: Buntglas
  EN TS: The stained glass is huge.
  de TS: Das Buntglas ist riesig.
  EN FS: The stained glass is tiny.
  de FS: Das Buntglas ist winzig.
  EN TP: tall stained glass windows
  de TP: hohe Fenster aus Buntglas
  EN FP: a stained glass lamp
  de FP: eine Lampe aus Buntglas
2312 | race car (noun): a very fast car built for racing on a track | loc: Rennwagen
  EN TS: A race car by the palm trees.
  de TS: Ein Rennwagen bei den Palmen.
  EN FS: A race car by the pine trees.
  de FS: Ein Rennwagen bei den Kiefern.
  EN TP: a red race car
  de TP: ein roter Rennwagen
  EN FP: a red race horse
  de FP: ein rotes Rennpferd
2313 | camper van (noun): a van you can travel and sleep in | loc: Campingbus
  EN TS: Home is where the camper van is.
  de TS: Zuhause ist, wo der Campingbus steht.
  EN FS: Home is where the orange tent is.
  de FS: Zuhause ist, wo das orange Zelt steht.
  EN TP: an orange camper van
  de TP: ein oranger Campingbus
  EN FP: a camper van in town
  de FP: ein Campingbus in der Stadt
2314 | ghost (noun): the spirit of a dead person | loc: Geist
  EN TS: The ghost's costume: one old sheet.
  de TS: Das Kostüm des Geists: ein altes Laken.
  EN FS: The ghost's costume: one old towel.
  de FS: Das Kostüm des Geists: ein altes Handtuch.
  EN TP: a white sheet ghost
  de TP: ein Geist aus weißem Laken
  EN FP: a ghost in a castle
  de FP: ein Geist in einer Burg
2315 | landscape (noun): a wide view of natural scenery | loc: Landschaft
  EN TS: This landscape is paper!
  de TS: Diese Landschaft ist aus Papier!
  EN FS: This landscape is glass!
  de FS: Diese Landschaft ist aus Glas!
  EN TP: a paper landscape
  de TP: eine Landschaft aus Papier
  EN FP: a landscape photo
  de FP: ein Landschaftsfoto
2317 | hood (noun): the part of a coat that covers your head | loc: Kapuze | translator note: FP pun "hood of a car" lost; used Motorhaube
  EN TS: Her red hood is up.
  de TS: Ihre rote Kapuze ist aufgesetzt.
  EN FS: Her red hood is down.
  de FS: Ihre rote Kapuze ist abgesetzt.
  EN TP: a red hood pulled up
  de TP: eine aufgesetzte rote Kapuze
  EN FP: the hood of a car
  de FP: die Motorhaube eines Autos
2318 | sword (noun): a long metal blade with a handle for fighting | loc: Schwert
  EN TS: She has a very long sword.
  de TS: Sie hat ein sehr langes Schwert.
  EN FS: She has a very long spear.
  de FS: Sie hat einen sehr langen Speer.
  EN TP: a long curved sword
  de TP: ein langes gebogenes Schwert
  EN FP: a long straight sword
  de FP: ein langes gerades Schwert
2322 | broken (adjective): cracked or in pieces, no longer whole | loc: zerbrochen
  EN TS: The glass is broken!
  de TS: Das Glas ist zerbrochen!
  EN FS: The clock is broken!
  de FS: Die Uhr ist zerbrochen!
  EN TP: a broken mirror portrait
  de TP: ein zerbrochenes Spiegelporträt
  EN FP: a broken arm in plaster
  de FP: ein gebrochener Arm im Gips
2324 | sing (verb): to make music with your voice by singing | loc: singen
  EN TS: He is singing like a star!
  de TS: Er singt wie ein Star!
  EN FS: He is dancing like a star!
  de FS: Er tanzt wie ein Star!
  EN TP: singing into a microphone
  de TP: ins Mikrofon singen
  EN FP: singing in the shower
  de FP: unter der Dusche singen
2326 | prince (noun): the son of a king or queen | loc: Prinz
  EN TS: The prince has cool blue hair.
  de TS: Der Prinz hat coole blaue Haare.
  EN FS: The prince has cool pink hair.
  de FS: Der Prinz hat coole pinke Haare.
  EN TP: a prince with a crown
  de TP: ein Prinz mit Krone
  EN FP: a prince on a horse
  de FP: ein Prinz auf einem Pferd
2327 | palm tree (noun): a tall tree with no branches and big top leaves | loc: Palme
  EN TS: This car and the palm trees look so cool.
  de TS: Dieses Auto und die Palmen sehen so cool aus.
  EN FS: This bike and the palm trees look so cool.
  de FS: Dieses Fahrrad und die Palmen sehen so cool aus.
  EN TP: palm trees at sunset
  de TP: Palmen bei Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: palm trees on an island
  de FP: Palmen auf einer Insel
2328 | throne (noun): the decorated chair of a king or queen | loc: Thron
  EN TS: Such a "humble" throne!
  de TS: So ein „bescheidener“ Thron!
  EN FS: Such a "humble" bed!
  de FS: So ein „bescheidenes“ Bett!
  EN TP: a huge golden throne
  de TP: ein riesiger goldener Thron
  EN FP: an empty golden throne
  de FP: ein leerer goldener Thron
2330 | give (verb): to cause someone to have something | loc: geben
  EN TS: She wants to give you flowers.
  de TS: Sie will dir Blumen geben.
  EN FS: She wants to give you a cake.
  de FS: Sie will dir einen Kuchen geben.
  EN TP: giving three yellow flowers
  de TP: drei gelbe Blumen geben
  EN FP: giving red roses
  de FP: rote Rosen geben
2333 | in love (phrase): having strong romantic feelings for someone | loc: verliebt
  EN TS: They are so in love!
  de TS: Sie sind so verliebt!
  EN FS: They are so angry!
  de FS: Sie sind so wütend!
  EN TP: in love under autumn leaves
  de TP: verliebt unter Herbstlaub
  EN FP: in love on a beach
  de FP: verliebt am Strand
2340 | strange (adjective): unusual and hard to understand | loc: seltsam
  EN TS: This house is a bit strange.
  de TS: Dieses Haus ist ein bisschen seltsam.
  EN FS: This car is a bit strange.
  de FS: Dieses Auto ist ein bisschen seltsam.
  EN TP: a strange tall house
  de TP: ein seltsames hohes Haus
  EN FP: a strange old boat
  de FP: ein seltsames altes Boot
2341 | death (noun): the end of a living thing's life | loc: Tod
  EN TS: Flowers make death look pretty.
  de TS: Blumen lassen den Tod hübsch aussehen.
  EN FS: Candles make death look pretty.
  de FS: Kerzen lassen den Tod hübsch aussehen.
  EN TP: death among flowers
  de TP: der Tod zwischen Blumen
  EN FP: death in a car crash
  de FP: Tod bei einem Autounfall
2344 | crooked (adjective): bent and leaning, not straight | loc: krumm
  EN TS: The houses are a bit crooked.
  de TS: Die Häuser sind ein bisschen krumm.
  EN FS: The trees are a bit crooked.
  de FS: Die Bäume sind ein bisschen krumm.
  EN TP: tall crooked houses
  de TP: hohe krumme Häuser
  EN FP: a crooked picture frame
  de FP: ein krummer Bilderrahmen
2345 | wizard (noun): a man in stories who can do magic | loc: Zauberer
  EN TS: What a long wizard beard!
  de TS: Der Zauberer hat so einen langen Bart!
  EN FS: What a short wizard beard!
  de FS: Der Zauberer hat so einen kurzen Bart!
  EN TP: an old wizard in grey
  de TP: ein alter Zauberer in Grau
  EN FP: an old wizard in red
  de FP: ein alter Zauberer in Rot
2347 | explore (verb): to travel through a new place to see it | loc: erkunden
  EN TS: He is exploring an exoplanet.
  de TS: Er erkundet einen Exoplaneten.
  EN FS: He is exploring a deep cave.
  de FS: Er erkundet eine tiefe Höhle.
  EN TP: exploring an alien world
  de TP: eine fremde Welt erkunden
  EN FP: exploring an old castle
  de FP: eine alte Burg erkunden
2349 | dress up (phrase): to put on a costume to look like someone else | loc: sich verkleiden
  EN TS: Even the cat dressed up!
  de TS: Sogar die Katze hat sich verkleidet!
  EN FS: Even the dog dressed up!
  de FS: Sogar der Hund hat sich verkleidet!
  EN TP: dressed up as witches
  de TP: als Hexen verkleidet
  EN FP: dressed up as pirates
  de FP: als Piraten verkleidet
2350 | carve (verb): to cut a shape into something hard | loc: schnitzen
  EN TS: Somebody carved faces! Wow!
  de TS: Jemand hat Gesichter geschnitzt! Wow!
  EN FS: Somebody carved names! Wow!
  de FS: Jemand hat Namen geschnitzt! Wow!
  EN TP: carved pumpkin faces
  de TP: geschnitzte Kürbisgesichter
  EN FP: carved wooden faces
  de FP: geschnitzte Holzgesichter
2351 | drive (verb): to operate or control a vehicle | loc: fahren | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Someone is driving a green car.
  de TS: Jemand fährt ein grünes Auto.
  EN FS: Someone is driving a yellow car.
  de FS: Jemand fährt ein gelbes Auto.
  EN TP: to drive through autumn
  de TP: durch den Herbst fahren
  EN FP: to drive through the snow
  de FP: durch den Schnee fahren
2353 | giant (adjective): far bigger than normal for its kind | loc: riesig
  EN TS: The mushrooms are giant, bro.
  de TS: Die Pilze sind riesig, Bro.
  EN FS: The mushrooms are tiny, bro.
  de FS: Die Pilze sind winzig, Bro.
  EN TP: giant pink mushrooms
  de TP: riesige rosa Pilze
  EN FP: giant pink flowers
  de FP: riesige rosa Blumen
2354 | headdress (noun): a decorated head covering for ceremonies | loc: Kopfschmuck
  EN TS: A huge golden headdress!
  de TS: Ein riesiger goldener Kopfschmuck!
  EN FS: A huge silver headdress!
  de FS: Ein riesiger silberner Kopfschmuck!
  EN TP: a huge golden headdress
  de TP: ein riesiger goldener Kopfschmuck
  EN FP: taking off a headdress
  de FP: einen Kopfschmuck abnehmen
2356 | toward (preposition): in the direction of something | loc: zu
  EN TS: The road leads toward a planet.
  de TS: Die Straße führt zu einem Planeten.
  EN FS: The road leads toward a castle.
  de FS: Die Straße führt zu einer Burg.
  EN TP: toward a huge planet
  de TP: zu einem riesigen Planeten
  EN FP: toward a huge city
  de FP: zu einer riesigen Stadt
2357 | black and white (phrase): with no colors, only dark and light shades | loc: schwarz-weiß
  EN TS: The house is black and white.
  de TS: Das Haus ist schwarz-weiß.
  EN FS: The house is red and white.
  de FS: Das Haus ist rot-weiß.
  EN TP: a black and white drawing
  de TP: eine schwarz-weiße Zeichnung
  EN FP: a black and white film
  de FP: ein Schwarz-Weiß-Film
2358 | farm (noun): land where people grow food and keep animals | loc: Bauernhof
  EN TS: The farm has red roofs.
  de TS: Der Bauernhof hat rote Dächer.
  EN FS: The farm has blue roofs.
  de FS: Der Bauernhof hat blaue Dächer.
  EN TP: a farm on a hillside
  de TP: ein Bauernhof am Hang
  EN FP: a farm with cows
  de FP: ein Bauernhof mit Kühen
2359 | traditional (adjective): done or worn as it was long ago | loc: traditionell
  EN TS: They wear traditional dress.
  de TS: Sie tragen traditionelle Kleidung.
  EN FS: They wear modern dress.
  de FS: Sie tragen moderne Kleidung.
  EN TP: traditional Indian dress
  de TP: traditionelle indische Kleidung
  EN FP: a traditional wedding cake
  de FP: eine traditionelle Hochzeitstorte
2360 | fast (adjective): moving or able to move very quickly | loc: schnell
  EN TS: That red car looks crazy fast.
  de TS: Dieses rote Auto sieht krass schnell aus.
  EN FS: That red van looks crazy fast.
  de FS: Dieser rote Transporter sieht krass schnell aus.
  EN TP: a fast red car
  de TP: ein schnelles rotes Auto
  EN FP: a fast red boat
  de FP: ein schnelles rotes Boot
2363 | mysterious (adjective): strange and hard to explain | loc: geheimnisvoll
  EN TS: She's turning into mysterious smoke.
  de TS: Sie verwandelt sich in geheimnisvollen Rauch.
  EN FS: She's turning into mysterious water.
  de FS: Sie verwandelt sich in geheimnisvolles Wasser.
  EN TP: a mysterious smoky woman
  de TP: eine geheimnisvolle Frau aus Rauch
  EN FP: a mysterious locked door
  de FP: eine geheimnisvolle verschlossene Tür
2364 | bull (noun): a large male animal of the cow family | loc: Stier
  EN TS: A white bull is behind him.
  de TS: Hinter ihm steht ein weißer Stier.
  EN FS: A white horse is behind him.
  de FS: Hinter ihm steht ein weißes Pferd.
  EN TP: a bull with curved horns
  de TP: ein Stier mit gebogenen Hörnern
  EN FP: a bull in a ring
  de FP: ein Stier in der Arena
2365 | metal (noun): a hard shiny material like iron or steel | loc: Metall
  EN TS: His metal suit is so shiny.
  de TS: Sein Anzug aus Metall ist mega glänzend.
  EN FS: His metal suit is so dirty.
  de FS: Sein Anzug aus Metall ist mega dreckig.
  EN TP: a red metal suit
  de TP: ein roter Anzug aus Metall
  EN FP: a red metal car
  de FP: ein rotes Auto aus Metall
2367 | dirty (adjective): covered with dirt or grime | loc: schmutzig
  EN TS: This car is a little dirty.
  de TS: Dieses Auto ist ein kleines bisschen schmutzig.
  EN FS: This bus is a little dirty.
  de FS: Dieser Bus ist ein kleines bisschen schmutzig.
  EN TP: an old dirty sports car
  de TP: ein alter schmutziger Sportwagen
  EN FP: a dirty old bus
  de FP: ein schmutziger alter Bus
2368 | paradise (noun): a perfect place where all is wonderful | loc: Paradies
  EN TS: This beach is total paradise.
  de TS: Dieser Strand ist das totale Paradies.
  EN FS: This desert is total paradise.
  de FS: Diese Wüste ist das totale Paradies.
  EN TP: a tropical paradise at sunset
  de TP: ein tropisches Paradies am Abend
  EN FP: a paradise for skiers
  de FP: ein Paradies für Skifahrer
2371 | sorrow (noun): deep sadness, especially about a loss | loc: Kummer
  EN TS: The angel is lost in sorrow.
  de TS: Der Engel ist in Kummer versunken.
  EN FS: The angel is lost in a book.
  de FS: Der Engel ist in ein Buch versunken.
  EN TP: an angel full of sorrow
  de TP: ein Engel voller Kummer
  EN FP: an angel full of joy
  de FP: ein Engel voller Freude
2372 | exhausted (adjective): extremely tired with no energy left | loc: erschöpft
  EN TS: He looks totally exhausted.
  de TS: Er sieht total erschöpft aus.
  EN FS: He looks totally excited.
  de FS: Er sieht total aufgeregt aus.
  EN TP: an exhausted worker
  de TP: ein erschöpfter Arbeiter
  EN FP: an exhausted phone battery
  de FP: ein leerer Handyakku
2373 | universe (noun): all of space with its stars and planets | loc: das Universum
  EN TS: The universe looks crowded.
  de TS: Das Universum wirkt überfüllt.
  EN FS: The universe looks empty.
  de FS: Das Universum wirkt leer.
  EN TP: a universe full of planets
  de TP: ein Universum voller Planeten
  EN FP: a universe without stars
  de FP: ein Universum ohne Sterne
2375 | half (noun): one of two equal parts of something | loc: Hälfte
  EN TS: Half grey, half yellow. It cannot decide.
  de TS: Eine Hälfte grau, eine Hälfte gelb. Es kann sich nicht entscheiden.
  EN FS: Half grey, half green. It cannot decide.
  de FS: Eine Hälfte grau, eine Hälfte grün. Es kann sich nicht entscheiden.
  EN TP: half a yellow car
  de TP: die Hälfte eines gelben Autos
  EN FP: half a yellow bus
  de FP: die Hälfte eines gelben Busses
2378 | relax (verb): to calm down and let your body feel loose | loc: entspannen
  EN TS: She is totally relaxing now.
  de TS: Sie entspannt gerade richtig.
  EN FS: She is totally running now.
  de FS: Sie rennt gerade richtig.
  EN TP: relaxing under the moon
  de TP: unter dem Mond entspannen
  EN FP: relaxing on the beach
  de FP: am Strand entspannen
2379 | fall (verb): to descend freely under gravity | loc: fallen
  EN TS: Red leaves are falling.
  de TS: Rote Blätter fallen.
  EN FS: Red apples are falling.
  de FS: Rote Äpfel fallen.
  EN TP: leaves falling in the rain
  de TP: Blätter fallen im Regen
  EN FP: snow falling on cars
  de FP: Schnee fällt auf Autos
2380 | escape (verb): to get away from danger | loc: entkommen
  EN TS: The car is escaping the fire!
  de TS: Das Auto entkommt dem Feuer!
  EN FS: The car is escaping the flood!
  de FS: Das Auto entkommt der Flut!
  EN TP: escaping a burning forest
  de TP: einem brennenden Wald entkommen
  EN FP: escaping a burning house
  de FP: einem brennenden Haus entkommen
2381 | claws (noun): the sharp curved nails on an animal's feet | loc: Krallen
  EN TS: Those claws are really sharp!
  de TS: Diese Krallen sind echt scharf!
  EN FS: Those teeth are really sharp!
  de FS: Diese Zähne sind echt scharf!
  EN TP: claws on a branch
  de TP: Krallen auf einem Ast
  EN FP: claws on a cat
  de FP: Krallen einer Katze
2382 | scales (noun): the hard shiny plates on a fish's skin | loc: Schuppen | translator note: FP pun "scales" (weighing) lost; used Waage
  EN TS: Look, her tail has blue scales.
  de TS: Schau, ihr Fischschwanz hat blaue Schuppen.
  EN FS: Look, her tail has pink scales.
  de FS: Schau, ihr Fischschwanz hat rosa Schuppen.
  EN TP: a tail with blue scales
  de TP: ein Schwanz mit blauen Schuppen
  EN FP: weighing on the scales
  de FP: sich auf die Waage stellen
2383 | gem (noun): a beautiful precious stone used in jewellery | loc: Edelstein
  EN TS: Fire and gems everywhere!
  de TS: Überall Feuer und Edelsteine!
  EN FS: Ice and gems everywhere!
  de FS: Überall Eis und Edelsteine!
  EN TP: sparkling colorful gems
  de TP: funkelnde bunte Edelsteine
  EN FP: gems in a dark cave
  de FP: Edelsteine in einer dunklen Höhle
2384 | kingdom (noun): a land that a king or queen rules | loc: Königreich
  EN TS: A tiny kingdom on a hill.
  de TS: Ein winziges Königreich auf einem Hügel.
  EN FS: A tiny kingdom on an island.
  de FS: Ein winziges Königreich auf einer Insel.
  EN TP: a storybook kingdom
  de TP: ein Königreich wie im Märchen
  EN FP: the animal kingdom
  de FP: das Königreich der Tiere
2385 | alien (adjective): coming from another planet, not from Earth | loc: außerirdisch
  EN TS: A purple alien landscape.
  de TS: Eine lila außerirdische Landschaft.
  EN FS: A green alien landscape.
  de FS: Eine grüne außerirdische Landschaft.
  EN TP: a purple alien world
  de TP: eine lila außerirdische Welt
  EN FP: an alien in a spaceship
  de FP: ein Außerirdischer im Raumschiff
2386 | railing (noun): a fence of bars you hold onto | loc: Geländer
  EN TS: The railing faces the sunset.
  de TS: Vom Geländer aus sieht man den Sonnenuntergang.
  EN FS: The railing faces a mountain.
  de FS: Vom Geländer aus sieht man einen Berg.
  EN TP: a metal balcony railing
  de TP: ein Balkongeländer aus Metall
  EN FP: a railing on a staircase
  de FP: ein Treppengeländer
2387 | twisted (adjective): bent and turned in many directions | loc: verdreht
  EN TS: The tree is twisted. Cool.
  de TS: Der Baum ist verdreht. Cool.
  EN FS: The tree is straight. Cool.
  de FS: Der Baum ist gerade. Cool.
  EN TP: a twisted old tree
  de TP: ein verdrehter alter Baum
  EN FP: a twisted metal fence
  de FP: ein verdrehter Metallzaun
2388 | gamer (noun): a person who plays video games a lot | loc: Gamer
  EN TS: This gamer loves pink.
  de TS: Dieser Gamer liebt Pink.
  EN FS: This gamer loves green.
  de FS: Dieser Gamer liebt Grün.
  EN TP: a gamer in pink
  de TP: ein Gamer in Pink
  EN FP: a gamer in blue
  de FP: ein Gamer in Blau
2389 | faith (noun): a strong belief in God or a religion | loc: Glaube
  EN TS: She is praying with faith.
  de TS: Sie betet voller Glauben.
  EN FS: She is praying with open arms.
  de FS: Sie betet mit offenen Armen.
  EN TP: praying with deep faith
  de TP: in tiefem Glauben beten
  EN FP: losing her faith
  de FP: ihren Glauben verlieren
2390 | stylish (adjective): dressed in a fashionable, attractive way | loc: stilvoll
  EN TS: So stylish on a beach!
  de TS: So stilvoll am Strand!
  EN FS: So stylish on a ship!
  de FS: So stilvoll auf einem Schiff!
  EN TP: a stylish beach look
  de TP: ein stilvoller Strandlook
  EN FP: a stylish winter coat
  de FP: ein stilvoller Wintermantel
2391 | scenery (noun): the beautiful natural landscape around you | loc: Landschaft | translator note: FP pun "scenery for a school play" = Kulisse in German
  EN TS: Epic scenery, red sky.
  de TS: Epische Landschaft, roter Himmel.
  EN FS: Epic scenery, blue sky.
  de FS: Epische Landschaft, blauer Himmel.
  EN TP: scenery with a huge moon
  de TP: eine Landschaft mit riesigem Mond
  EN FP: scenery for a school play
  de FP: die Kulisse fürs Schultheater
2392 | stroll (noun): a slow, relaxed walk for pleasure | loc: Spaziergang
  EN TS: A stroll in a straw hat? Stylish.
  de TS: Ein Spaziergang mit Strohhut? Stilvoll.
  EN FS: A stroll in a red hat? Stylish.
  de FS: Ein Spaziergang mit rotem Hut? Stilvoll.
  EN TP: a stroll among flowers
  de TP: ein Spaziergang zwischen Blumen
  EN FP: a stroll on the beach
  de FP: ein Spaziergang am Strand
2393 | high heels (noun): shoes with a tall thin part under the back | loc: High Heels
  EN TS: Office look with high heels.
  de TS: Büro-Look mit High Heels.
  EN FS: Office look with trainers.
  de FS: Büro-Look mit Turnschuhen.
  EN TP: black strappy high heels
  de TP: schwarze High Heels mit Riemchen
  EN FP: high heels in a box
  de FP: High Heels im Karton
2394 | choose (verb): to pick one thing from several choices | loc: wählen
  EN TS: He has to choose a road.
  de TS: Er muss einen Weg wählen.
  EN FS: He has to choose a boat.
  de FS: Er muss ein Boot wählen.
  EN TP: choosing the right road
  de TP: den richtigen Weg wählen
  EN FP: choosing the right dress
  de FP: das richtige Kleid wählen
2395 | vest (noun): clothing without sleeves worn over a shirt | loc: Weste
  EN TS: His vest has gold buttons.
  de TS: Seine Weste hat goldene Knöpfe.
  EN FS: His vest has silver buttons.
  de FS: Seine Weste hat silberne Knöpfe.
  EN TP: a black leather vest
  de TP: eine schwarze Weste aus Leder
  EN FP: a vest under a jacket
  de FP: eine Weste unter einer Jacke
2396 | corset (noun): a tight laced top that shapes the waist | loc: Korsett
  EN TS: That laced corset is stunning.
  de TS: Dieses geschnürte Korsett ist umwerfend.
  EN FS: That laced glove is stunning.
  de FS: Dieser geschnürte Handschuh ist umwerfend.
  EN TP: a laced corset
  de TP: ein geschnürtes Korsett
  EN FP: laced boots
  de FP: geschnürte Stiefel
2397 | gloomy (adjective): dark and sad, without light or cheer | loc: düster
  EN TS: This room is so gloomy!
  de TS: Dieser Raum ist so düster!
  EN FS: This room is so sunny!
  de FS: Dieser Raum ist so sonnig!
  EN TP: a gloomy gothic room
  de TP: ein düsterer gotischer Raum
  EN FP: a gloomy rainy day
  de FP: ein düsterer Regentag
2398 | terrace (noun): an open paved area outside a building | loc: Terrasse
  EN TS: The terrace offers sea views.
  de TS: Die Terrasse bietet Meerblick.
  EN FS: The terrace offers city views.
  de FS: Die Terrasse bietet Stadtblick.
  EN TP: a tiled seaside terrace
  de TP: eine geflieste Terrasse am Meer
  EN FP: a terrace in the mountains
  de FP: eine Terrasse in den Bergen
2400 | fierce (adjective): violent, angry and frightening to look at | loc: grimmig
  EN TS: That's one fierce viking!
  de TS: Das ist mal ein grimmiger Wikinger!
  EN FS: That's one fierce pirate!
  de FS: Das ist mal ein grimmiger Pirat!
  EN TP: a fierce angry stare
  de TP: ein grimmiger, wütender Blick
  EN FP: a fierce storm at sea
  de FP: ein heftiger Sturm auf See
2401 | fantasy (noun): an imagined magical world, not real life | loc: Fantasie
  EN TS: A path into a fantasy world.
  de TS: Ein Weg in eine Welt der Fantasie.
  EN FS: A path into a busy city.
  de FS: Ein Weg in eine belebte Stadt.
  EN TP: a fantasy forest path
  de TP: ein Waldweg voller Fantasie
  EN FP: a fantasy book cover
  de FP: ein Fantasy-Buchcover
2404 | lotus (noun): a large white water flower with many petals | loc: Lotus
  EN TS: This lotus has an orange centre.
  de TS: Dieser Lotus hat eine orange Mitte.
  EN FS: This lotus has a purple centre.
  de FS: Dieser Lotus hat eine lila Mitte.
  EN TP: a white lotus flower
  de TP: eine weiße Lotusblüte
  EN FP: a lotus yoga pose
  de FP: der Lotussitz im Yoga
2406 | jeep (noun): a strong car for driving on rough roads | loc: Jeep
  EN TS: One jeep, too many bags!
  de TS: Ein Jeep, viel zu viele Taschen!
  EN FS: One bike, too many bags!
  de FS: Ein Fahrrad, viel zu viele Taschen!
  EN TP: a jeep full of bags
  de TP: ein Jeep voller Taschen
  EN FP: a jeep in the city
  de FP: ein Jeep in der Stadt
2408 | imagination (noun): the mind's power to create unreal worlds | loc: Fantasie
  EN TS: Imagination opens a real path.
  de TS: Fantasie öffnet einen echten Weg.
  EN FS: Imagination opens a real door.
  de FS: Fantasie öffnet eine echte Tür.
  EN TP: a book of imagination
  de TP: ein Buch der Fantasie
  EN FP: no imagination at all
  de FP: überhaupt keine Fantasie
2411 | ornate (adjective): covered in rich, detailed patterns | loc: reich verziert
  EN TS: That crown is so ornate!
  de TS: Diese Krone ist so reich verziert!
  EN FS: That mask is so ornate!
  de FS: Diese Maske ist so reich verziert!
  EN TP: an ornate golden crown
  de TP: eine reich verzierte goldene Krone
  EN FP: an ornate wooden door
  de FP: eine reich verzierte Holztür
2412 | arm in arm (phrase): walking with your arm linked through another's | loc: Arm in Arm
  EN TS: They are walking arm in arm.
  de TS: Sie gehen Arm in Arm.
  EN FS: They are running arm in arm.
  de FS: Sie rennen Arm in Arm.
  EN TP: walking arm in arm
  de TP: Arm in Arm gehen
  EN FP: sitting arm in arm
  de FP: Arm in Arm sitzen
2413 | cub (noun): the baby of a wild animal like a wolf | loc: Junges
  EN TS: She is hugging a wolf cub!
  de TS: Sie umarmt ein Wolfsjunges!
  EN FS: She is hugging a bear cub!
  de FS: Sie umarmt ein Bärenjunges!
  EN TP: hugging a wolf cub
  de TP: ein Wolfsjunges umarmen
  EN FP: hugging a big wolf
  de FP: einen großen Wolf umarmen
2415 | garland (noun): a chain of flowers worn or hung as decoration | loc: Girlande
  EN TS: The god wears flower garlands.
  de TS: Der Gott trägt Girlanden aus Blumen.
  EN FS: The god wears paper garlands.
  de FS: Der Gott trägt Girlanden aus Papier.
  EN TP: garlands of red flowers
  de TP: Girlanden aus roten Blumen
  EN FP: garlands on a Christmas tree
  de FP: Girlanden am Weihnachtsbaum
2417 | harmony (noun): a state where opposites fit together calmly | loc: Harmonie
  EN TS: Dark and light in harmony.
  de TS: Dunkel und Hell in Harmonie.
  EN FS: Red and blue in harmony.
  de FS: Rot und Blau in Harmonie.
  EN TP: a sphere of harmony
  de TP: eine Kugel der Harmonie
  EN FP: singing in harmony
  de FP: in Harmonie singen
2418 | songbird (noun): a small bird known for its singing | loc: Singvogel
  EN TS: I think it's a songbird.
  de TS: Ich glaube, das ist ein Singvogel.
  EN FS: I think it's a pigeon.
  de FS: Ich glaube, das ist eine Taube.
  EN TP: a songbird on a branch
  de TP: ein Singvogel auf einem Ast
  EN FP: a songbird on a roof
  de FP: ein Singvogel auf einem Dach
2420 | rickety (adjective): old, weak and likely to fall apart | loc: wackelig
  EN TS: This rickety tower is "safe".
  de TS: Dieser wackelige Turm ist „sicher“.
  EN FS: This rickety bridge is "safe".
  de FS: Diese wackelige Brücke ist „sicher“.
  EN TP: a rickety tower of houses
  de TP: ein wackeliger Turm aus Häusern
  EN FP: a rickety old chair
  de FP: ein wackeliger alter Stuhl
2421 | fungus (noun): a mushroom-like thing that grows in damp places | loc: Pilz
  EN TS: This fungus is big. Really big.
  de TS: Dieser Pilz ist groß. Echt groß.
  EN FS: This fungus is small. Really small.
  de FS: Dieser Pilz ist klein. Echt klein.
  EN TP: giant pale fungus
  de TP: ein riesiger blasser Pilz
  EN FP: fungus on old bread
  de FP: Schimmelpilz auf altem Brot
2422 | overalls (noun): trousers with straps over the shoulders | loc: Latzhose
  EN TS: She is reading in overalls.
  de TS: Sie liest in Latzhose.
  EN FS: She is sleeping in overalls.
  de FS: Sie schläft in Latzhose.
  EN TP: blue denim overalls
  de TP: eine blaue Jeans-Latzhose
  EN FP: overalls covered in paint
  de FP: eine Latzhose voller Farbe
2424 | cypress (noun): a tall narrow dark-green tree | loc: Zypresse
  EN TS: Cypresses grow on the left.
  de TS: Links wachsen Zypressen.
  EN FS: Cypresses grow on the right.
  de FS: Rechts wachsen Zypressen.
  EN TP: a row of cypress trees
  de TP: eine Reihe Zypressen
  EN FP: a cypress in a pot
  de FP: eine Zypresse im Topf
2425 | frame (noun): a decorated border that surrounds a picture | loc: Rahmen
  EN TS: A black cat in a spooky frame!
  de TS: Eine schwarze Katze in einem gruseligen Rahmen!
  EN FS: A white cat in a spooky frame!
  de FS: Eine weiße Katze in einem gruseligen Rahmen!
  EN TP: a frame with black roses
  de TP: ein Rahmen mit schwarzen Rosen
  EN FP: a frame for a bicycle
  de FP: ein Fahrradrahmen
2428 | monitor (noun): the screen you look at on a computer | loc: Monitor
  EN TS: Three monitors, maximum focus.
  de TS: Drei Monitore, maximaler Fokus.
  EN FS: Two monitors, maximum focus.
  de FS: Zwei Monitore, maximaler Fokus.
  EN TP: three large monitors
  de TP: drei große Monitore
  EN FP: a baby monitor
  de FP: ein Babyfon
2429 | stag (noun): an adult male deer with large antlers | loc: Hirsch
  EN TS: Yo, the stag is in a stream.
  de TS: Yo, der Hirsch steht im Bach.
  EN FS: Yo, the stag is in a field.
  de FS: Yo, der Hirsch steht auf einem Feld.
  EN TP: a stag in a stream
  de TP: ein Hirsch im Bach
  EN FP: a stag in the snow
  de FP: ein Hirsch im Schnee
2430 | flow (verb): to move along smoothly like water | loc: fließen
  EN TS: The river flows past rocks.
  de TS: Der Fluss fließt an Felsen vorbei.
  EN FS: The river flows past houses.
  de FS: Der Fluss fließt an Häusern vorbei.
  EN TP: a river flowing through rocks
  de TP: ein Fluss fließt durch Felsen
  EN FP: a river flowing through town
  de FP: ein Fluss fließt durch die Stadt
2432 | flamenco (noun): a fiery Spanish dance with fans and stamping | loc: Flamenco
  EN TS: Her flamenco pose is fire!
  de TS: Ihre Flamenco-Pose ist der Hammer!
  EN FS: Her ballet pose is fire!
  de FS: Ihre Ballett-Pose ist der Hammer!
  EN TP: flamenco with a fan
  de TP: Flamenco mit Fächer
  EN FP: flamenco on a stage
  de FP: Flamenco auf einer Bühne
2433 | gallop (verb): how a horse runs at its fastest speed | loc: galoppieren
  EN TS: The horse is galloping at us!
  de TS: Das Pferd galoppiert auf uns zu!
  EN FS: The donkey is galloping at us!
  de FS: Der Esel galoppiert auf uns zu!
  EN TP: a galloping white horse
  de TP: ein galoppierendes weißes Pferd
  EN FP: a galloping black horse
  de FP: ein galoppierendes schwarzes Pferd
2434 | still life (noun): a painting of arranged objects like flowers | loc: Stillleben
  EN TS: The still life shows blossoms.
  de TS: Das Stillleben zeigt Blüten.
  EN FS: The still life shows oranges.
  de FS: Das Stillleben zeigt Orangen.
  EN TP: a still life with blossoms
  de TP: ein Stillleben mit Blüten
  EN FP: a still life with fruit
  de FP: ein Stillleben mit Obst
2435 | pebble (noun): a small smooth round stone | loc: Kiesel
  EN TS: The stream is full of pebbles.
  de TS: Der Bach ist voller Kiesel.
  EN FS: The stream is full of fish.
  de FS: Der Bach ist voller Fische.
  EN TP: smooth round pebbles
  de TP: glatte runde Kiesel
  EN FP: pebbles on a beach
  de FP: Kiesel am Strand
2439 | wet (adjective): covered or soaked with water | loc: nass
  EN TS: The street is wet at night.
  de TS: Die Straße ist nachts nass.
  EN FS: The street is dry at night.
  de FS: Die Straße ist nachts trocken.
  EN TP: a wet night street
  de TP: eine nasse Straße bei Nacht
  EN FP: a wet sandy beach
  de FP: ein nasser Sandstrand
2440 | electricity (noun): the energy made by moving electrons | loc: Strom
  EN TS: The electricity is everywhere!
  de TS: Der Strom ist überall!
  EN FS: The water is everywhere!
  de FS: Das Wasser ist überall!
  EN TP: sparks of electricity
  de TP: Funken und Strom
  EN FP: an electricity bill
  de FP: eine Stromrechnung
2446 | shoelaces (noun): strings that tie your shoes or boots closed | loc: Schnürsenkel
  EN TS: Big bows, long shoelaces!
  de TS: Große Schleifen, lange Schnürsenkel!
  EN FS: Big bows, short shoelaces!
  de FS: Große Schleifen, kurze Schnürsenkel!
  EN TP: long yellow shoelaces
  de TP: lange gelbe Schnürsenkel
  EN FP: broken yellow shoelaces
  de FP: gerissene gelbe Schnürsenkel
2449 | shop window (noun): a big glass front where a store shows its goods | loc: Schaufenster
  EN TS: Just a "few" glowing shop windows.
  de TS: Nur „ein paar“ leuchtende Schaufenster.
  EN FS: Just a "few" dark shop windows.
  de FS: Nur „ein paar“ dunkle Schaufenster.
  EN TP: glowing shop windows
  de TP: leuchtende Schaufenster
  EN FP: a broken shop window
  de FP: ein kaputtes Schaufenster
2450 | thunderstorm (noun): a storm with lightning and loud rumbling | loc: Gewitter
  EN TS: A thunderstorm over the water.
  de TS: Ein Gewitter über dem Wasser.
  EN FS: A thunderstorm over the city.
  de FS: Ein Gewitter über der Stadt.
  EN TP: a thunderstorm over water
  de TP: ein Gewitter über dem Wasser
  EN FP: a thunderstorm over a town
  de FP: ein Gewitter über einer Stadt
2451 | eiffel tower (noun): the famous tall iron landmark in Paris | loc: Eiffelturm
  EN TS: A bird near the Eiffel Tower.
  de TS: Ein Vogel am Eiffelturm.
  EN FS: A plane near the Eiffel Tower.
  de FS: Ein Flugzeug am Eiffelturm.
  EN TP: the riverside Eiffel Tower
  de TP: der Eiffelturm am Fluss
  EN FP: the Eiffel Tower in snow
  de FP: der Eiffelturm im Schnee
2452 | romantic (adjective): connected with love, making you feel love | loc: romantisch
  EN TS: The snowy walk is romantic!
  de TS: Der Spaziergang im Schnee ist romantisch!
  EN FS: The rainy walk is romantic!
  de FS: Der Spaziergang im Regen ist romantisch!
  EN TP: a romantic snowy walk
  de TP: ein romantischer Spaziergang im Schnee
  EN FP: a romantic candle dinner
  de FP: ein romantisches Dinner bei Kerzenlicht
2454 | winding (adjective): curving and turning again and again | loc: kurvenreich
  EN TS: The winding path has lanterns.
  de TS: Der kurvenreiche Weg hat Laternen.
  EN FS: The straight path has lamps.
  de FS: Der gerade Weg hat Lampen.
  EN TP: a winding cobblestone path
  de TP: ein kurvenreicher Kopfsteinpflasterweg
  EN FP: a winding mountain river
  de FP: ein kurvenreicher Bergfluss
2455 | shorts (noun): trousers that end above the knee | loc: Shorts
  EN TS: She wears green shorts.
  de TS: Sie trägt grüne Shorts.
  EN FS: She wears green trousers.
  de FS: Sie trägt eine grüne Hose.
  EN TP: green denim shorts
  de TP: grüne Shorts aus Jeans
  EN FP: green swimming shorts
  de FP: grüne Badeshorts
2457 | nurse (noun): a person who cares for sick people in a hospital | loc: Krankenschwester
  EN TS: The nurse has a stethoscope.
  de TS: Die Krankenschwester hat ein Stethoskop.
  EN FS: The nurse has a clipboard.
  de FS: Die Krankenschwester hat ein Klemmbrett.
  EN TP: a nurse in uniform
  de TP: eine Krankenschwester in Uniform
  EN FP: a nurse with a baby
  de FP: eine Krankenschwester mit Baby
2458 | farmhouse (noun): the main house on a farm, where the farmer lives | loc: Bauernhaus
  EN TS: A farmhouse with lit windows.
  de TS: Ein Bauernhaus mit erleuchteten Fenstern.
  EN FS: A farmhouse with dark windows.
  de FS: Ein Bauernhaus mit dunklen Fenstern.
  EN TP: a farmhouse at sunset
  de TP: ein Bauernhaus bei Sonnenuntergang
  EN FP: a farmhouse by the sea
  de FP: ein Bauernhaus am Meer
2460 | wildflowers (noun): flowers that grow by themselves in fields | loc: Wildblumen
  EN TS: Wildflowers in a blue pot, cute.
  de TS: Wildblumen im blauen Topf, süß.
  EN FS: Wildflowers in a red pot, cute.
  de FS: Wildblumen im roten Topf, süß.
  EN TP: a pot of wildflowers
  de TP: ein Topf mit Wildblumen
  EN FP: a field of wildflowers
  de FP: ein Feld voller Wildblumen
2462 | starry (adjective): full of stars, said about a night sky | loc: sternenklar
  EN TS: The starry sky has a moon.
  de TS: Am sternenklaren Himmel steht ein Mond.
  EN FS: The starry sky has a rainbow.
  de FS: Am sternenklaren Himmel steht ein Regenbogen.
  EN TP: a starry night sky
  de TP: ein sternenklarer Nachthimmel
  EN FP: a starry city night
  de FP: eine sternenklare Nacht in der Stadt
2463 | peony (noun): a big round flower with soft ruffled petals | loc: Pfingstrose
  EN TS: The valley features pink peonies.
  de TS: Das Tal punktet mit rosa Pfingstrosen.
  EN FS: The valley features pink tulips.
  de FS: Das Tal punktet mit rosa Tulpen.
  EN TP: pink peonies on a hill
  de TP: rosa Pfingstrosen am Hang
  EN FP: peonies in a vase
  de FP: Pfingstrosen in einer Vase
2464 | symmetrical (adjective): the same on both sides, like a mirror | loc: symmetrisch
  EN TS: The patterns are symmetrical.
  de TS: Die Muster sind symmetrisch.
  EN FS: The patterns are colourful.
  de FS: Die Muster sind bunt.
  EN TP: symmetrical leaf patterns
  de TP: symmetrische Blattmuster
  EN FP: a symmetrical building
  de FP: ein symmetrisches Gebäude
2465 | float (verb): to stay up in the air without falling | loc: schweben
  EN TS: She is floating. No big deal.
  de TS: Sie schwebt. Keine große Sache.
  EN FS: She is swimming. No big deal.
  de FS: Sie schwimmt. Keine große Sache.
  EN TP: floating in a blue sky
  de TP: im blauen Himmel schweben
  EN FP: floating in a pool
  de FP: in einem Pool schweben
2466 | crystal (noun): a clear hard stone with flat shiny faces | loc: Kristall
  EN TS: Her dress is made of crystals.
  de TS: Ihr Kleid ist aus Kristallen.
  EN FS: Her dress is made of feathers.
  de FS: Ihr Kleid ist aus Federn.
  EN TP: a dress of glowing crystals
  de TP: ein Kleid aus leuchtenden Kristallen
  EN FP: a crystal glass of water
  de FP: ein Kristallglas mit Wasser
2470 | saxophone (noun): a curved metal wind instrument used in jazz | loc: Saxofon
  EN TS: The saxophone has a curved bell.
  de TS: Das Saxofon hat einen gebogenen Schalltrichter.
  EN FS: The saxophone has a straight bell.
  de FS: Das Saxofon hat einen geraden Schalltrichter.
  EN TP: a floating saxophone
  de TP: ein schwebendes Saxofon
  EN FP: a saxophone player
  de FP: ein Saxofonspieler
2471 | bookworm (noun): a person who reads all the time | loc: Leseratte
  EN TS: She is such a bookworm.
  de TS: Sie ist so eine Leseratte.
  EN FS: She is such a gamer.
  de FS: Sie ist so eine Gamerin.
  EN TP: a bookworm with a book
  de TP: eine Leseratte mit Buch
  EN FP: a bookworm with a phone
  de FP: eine Leseratte mit Handy
2472 | uniform (noun): clothing a group wears to be identified | loc: Uniform
  EN TS: Her uniform looks really neat.
  de TS: Ihre Uniform sieht echt ordentlich aus.
  EN FS: Her coat looks really neat.
  de FS: Ihr Mantel sieht echt ordentlich aus.
  EN TP: a school uniform
  de TP: eine Schuluniform
  EN FP: a police uniform
  de FP: eine Polizeiuniform
2473 | wreath (noun): a ring of leaves hung up as decoration | loc: der Kranz
  EN TS: The wreath is on a red door.
  de TS: Der Kranz hängt an einer roten Tür.
  EN FS: The wreath is on a blue door.
  de FS: Der Kranz hängt an einer blauen Tür.
  EN TP: a wreath on the door
  de TP: ein Kranz an der Tür
  EN FP: a wreath on her head
  de FP: ein Kranz auf ihrem Kopf
2474 | foam (noun): the mass of small white bubbles on waves | loc: Schaum
  EN TS: Wild foam on a stormy sea.
  de TS: Wilder Schaum auf stürmischer See.
  EN FS: Wild foam on a calm sea.
  de FS: Wilder Schaum auf ruhiger See.
  EN TP: foam on stormy waves
  de TP: Schaum auf stürmischen Wellen
  EN FP: coffee with milk foam
  de FP: Kaffee mit Milchschaum
2475 | barefoot (adjective): wearing nothing on your feet | loc: barfuß
  EN TS: She is reading barefoot.
  de TS: Sie liest barfuß.
  EN FS: She is dancing barefoot.
  de FS: Sie tanzt barfuß.
  EN TP: barefoot on a daybed
  de TP: barfuß auf einem Tagesbett
  EN FP: barefoot on the beach
  de FP: barfuß am Strand
2477 | messy (adjective): dirty and not in any order | loc: zerzaust
  EN TS: The wind made his hair messy.
  de TS: Der Wind hat seine Haare zerzaust.
  EN FS: The rain made his hair messy.
  de FS: Der Regen hat seine Haare zerzaust.
  EN TP: messy brown hair
  de TP: zerzauste braune Haare
  EN FP: a messy bedroom
  de FP: ein unordentliches Schlafzimmer
2478 | doctor (noun): a person licensed to give medical care | loc: Arzt
  EN TS: The doctor is smiling at us.
  de TS: Der Arzt lächelt uns an.
  EN FS: The doctor is shouting at us.
  de FS: Der Arzt schreit uns an.
  EN TP: a smiling cartoon doctor
  de TP: ein lächelnder Cartoon-Arzt
  EN FP: a doctor in surgery
  de FP: ein Arzt im OP
2480 | present (noun): a gift you give someone | loc: Geschenk
  EN TS: The car has too many presents!
  de TS: Das Auto hat zu viele Geschenke!
  EN FS: The car has too many dogs!
  de FS: Das Auto hat zu viele Hunde!
  EN TP: presents on a car roof
  de TP: Geschenke auf dem Autodach
  EN FP: presents under a tree
  de FP: Geschenke unter dem Baum
2481 | globe (noun): a small round model of the Earth on a stand | loc: Globus
  EN TS: He is holding a globe.
  de TS: Er hält einen Globus.
  EN FS: He is holding a ball.
  de FS: Er hält einen Ball.
  EN TP: holding a globe
  de TP: einen Globus halten
  EN FP: a snow globe
  de FP: eine Schneekugel
2482 | turret (noun): a small round tower on a big building | loc: das Türmchen
  EN TS: So many turrets on one castle!
  de TS: So viele Türmchen an einer Burg!
  EN FS: So many flags on one castle!
  de FS: So viele Fahnen an einer Burg!
  EN TP: pointed castle turrets
  de TP: spitze Türmchen einer Burg
  EN FP: a tank turret
  de FP: ein Panzerturm
2483 | dried (adjective): with all the water taken out to keep it | loc: getrocknet
  EN TS: Dried flowers lie in the book.
  de TS: Getrocknete Blumen liegen im Buch.
  EN FS: Fresh flowers lie in the book.
  de FS: Frische Blumen liegen im Buch.
  EN TP: dried flowers in a book
  de TP: getrocknete Blumen in einem Buch
  EN FP: dried fruit in a bowl
  de FP: getrocknetes Obst in einer Schale
2484 | steeple (noun): the tall pointed tower of a church | loc: Kirchturm
  EN TS: The church has a tall steeple.
  de TS: Die Kirche hat einen hohen Kirchturm.
  EN FS: The castle has a tall steeple.
  de FS: Die Burg hat einen hohen Kirchturm.
  EN TP: a church steeple in snow
  de TP: ein Kirchturm im Schnee
  EN FP: a steeple in a city
  de FP: ein Kirchturm in einer Stadt
2485 | sinister (adjective): looking evil, as if something bad will happen | loc: unheimlich
  EN TS: The crow man looks sinister.
  de TS: Der Krähenmann sieht unheimlich aus.
  EN FS: The cat man looks sinister.
  de FS: Der Katzenmann sieht unheimlich aus.
  EN TP: a sinister crow-headed figure
  de TP: eine unheimliche Gestalt mit Krähenkopf
  EN FP: a sinister black cat
  de FP: eine unheimliche schwarze Katze
2486 | hieroglyphs (noun): the picture symbols of ancient Egyptian writing | loc: Hieroglyphen
  EN TS: Hieroglyphs cover the wall.
  de TS: Hieroglyphen bedecken die Wand.
  EN FS: Flowers cover the wall.
  de FS: Blumen bedecken die Wand.
  EN TP: a wall of hieroglyphs
  de TP: eine Wand voller Hieroglyphen
  EN FP: hieroglyphs in a textbook
  de FP: Hieroglyphen im Schulbuch
2490 | snowman (noun): a winter figure made of big white frozen balls | loc: Schneemann
  EN TS: Nice hat! Is the snowman cold?
  de TS: Schöner Hut! Ist dem Schneemann kalt?
  EN FS: Nice hat! Is the dog cold?
  de FS: Schöner Hut! Ist dem Hund kalt?
  EN TP: a snowman in a hat
  de TP: ein Schneemann mit Hut
  EN FP: building a snowman
  de FP: einen Schneemann bauen
2492 | busy (adjective): full of people and activity | loc: belebt
  EN TS: The village is so busy!
  de TS: Das Dorf ist so belebt!
  EN FS: The village is so quiet!
  de FS: Das Dorf ist so ruhig!
  EN TP: a busy snowy village
  de TP: ein belebtes verschneites Dorf
  EN FP: a busy summer beach
  de FP: ein belebter Sommerstrand
2493 | quilt (noun): a warm cover sewn from many pieces of cloth | loc: Steppdecke
  EN TS: The farm is sewn as a quilt.
  de TS: Der Bauernhof ist als Steppdecke genäht.
  EN FS: The farm is sewn as a flag.
  de FS: Der Bauernhof ist als Flagge genäht.
  EN TP: a quilt of a farm
  de TP: eine Steppdecke mit Bauernhof
  EN FP: a quilt on a bed
  de FP: eine Steppdecke auf einem Bett
2494 | victorian (adjective): in the style of 19th-century England | loc: viktorianisch
  EN TS: Victorian street. Is that Sherlock?
  de TS: Viktorianische Straße. Ist das Sherlock?
  EN FS: Modern street. Is that Sherlock?
  de FS: Moderne Straße. Ist das Sherlock?
  EN TP: a snowy Victorian street
  de TP: eine verschneite viktorianische Straße
  EN FP: a Victorian tea party
  de FP: eine viktorianische Teeparty
2495 | sparrow (noun): a small brown bird you see everywhere | loc: Spatz
  EN TS: I counted two sparrows.
  de TS: Ich hab zwei Spatzen gezählt.
  EN FS: I counted four sparrows.
  de FS: Ich hab vier Spatzen gezählt.
  EN TP: two sparrows on a branch
  de TP: zwei Spatzen auf einem Ast
  EN FP: two sparrows in the snow
  de FP: zwei Spatzen im Schnee
2497 | santa claus (noun): the jolly man in red who brings Christmas presents | loc: Weihnachtsmann
  EN TS: Santa Claus is taking a break.
  de TS: Der Weihnachtsmann macht Pause.
  EN FS: Santa Claus is taking a bath.
  de FS: Der Weihnachtsmann nimmt ein Bad.
  EN TP: Santa Claus with presents
  de TP: der Weihnachtsmann mit Geschenken
  EN FP: Santa Claus with reindeer
  de FP: der Weihnachtsmann mit Rentieren
2498 | tender (adjective): gentle and full of love | loc: zärtlich | translator note: FP pun "tender steak" = zart, not zärtlich
  EN TS: They share a tender hug.
  de TS: Sie umarmen sich zärtlich.
  EN FS: They share a tender kiss.
  de FS: Sie küssen sich zärtlich.
  EN TP: a tender embrace
  de TP: eine zärtliche Umarmung
  EN FP: a tender steak
  de FP: ein zartes Steak
2499 | teddy bear (noun): a soft cuddly toy animal for children | loc: Teddybär
  EN TS: Two teddy bears are cuddling.
  de TS: Zwei Teddybären kuscheln.
  EN FS: Two teddy bears are fighting.
  de FS: Zwei Teddybären kämpfen.
  EN TP: teddy bears in the snow
  de TP: Teddybären im Schnee
  EN FP: teddy bears on a bed
  de FP: Teddybären auf einem Bett
2500 | laptop (noun): a small computer you can carry and fold shut | loc: Laptop
  EN TS: He is typing on a laptop.
  de TS: Er tippt auf einem Laptop.
  EN FS: He is typing on a phone.
  de FS: Er tippt auf einem Handy.
  EN TP: typing on a laptop
  de TP: auf einem Laptop tippen
  EN FP: carrying a laptop
  de FP: einen Laptop tragen
2501 | shiva (noun): the Hindu god with blue skin and a trident | loc: Shiva
  EN TS: Shiva is meditating on a rock.
  de TS: Shiva meditiert auf einem Felsen.
  EN FS: Shiva is meditating in a boat.
  de FS: Shiva meditiert in einem Boot.
  EN TP: Shiva with a trident
  de TP: Shiva mit Dreizack
  EN FP: Shiva with a sword
  de FP: Shiva mit Schwert
2502 | shrine (noun): a small holy place built to honour someone | loc: Schrein
  EN TS: A forest shrine full of moss.
  de TS: Ein Schrein im Wald, voller Moos.
  EN FS: A desert shrine full of sand.
  de FS: Ein Schrein in der Wüste, voller Sand.
  EN TP: a mossy forest shrine
  de TP: ein bemooster Schrein im Wald
  EN FP: a shrine in a city
  de FP: ein Schrein in einer Stadt
2504 | krishna (noun): a Hindu god shown with blue skin | loc: Krishna
  EN TS: Krishna has a peacock feather.
  de TS: Krishna hat eine Pfauenfeder.
  EN FS: Krishna has an eagle feather.
  de FS: Krishna hat eine Adlerfeder.
  EN TP: Krishna with a crown
  de TP: Krishna mit Krone
  EN FP: Krishna with a flute
  de FP: Krishna mit Flöte
2505 | rifle (noun): a long gun you hold with two hands | loc: Gewehr
  EN TS: Rain, a rifle and zero complaints.
  de TS: Regen, ein Gewehr und null Beschwerden.
  EN FS: Sun, a rifle and zero complaints.
  de FS: Sonne, ein Gewehr und null Beschwerden.
  EN TP: a long scoped rifle
  de TP: ein langes Gewehr mit Zielfernrohr
  EN FP: a rifle on the ground
  de FP: ein Gewehr auf dem Boden
2506 | geometric (adjective): made of simple regular shapes like squares | loc: geometrisch
  EN TS: Everything here is geometric.
  de TS: Hier ist alles geometrisch.
  EN FS: Everything here is blue.
  de FS: Hier ist alles blau.
  EN TP: pink geometric shapes
  de TP: rosa geometrische Formen
  EN FP: a geometric maths test
  de FP: ein Geometrietest in Mathe
2509 | lavender (noun): a purple plant with a famous sweet smell | loc: Lavendel
  EN TS: A path runs through lavender.
  de TS: Ein Weg führt durch Lavendel.
  EN FS: A path runs through wheat.
  de FS: Ein Weg führt durch Weizen.
  EN TP: rows of purple lavender
  de TP: Reihen von lila Lavendel
  EN FP: a bottle of lavender oil
  de FP: eine Flasche Lavendelöl
2510 | bedtime (noun): the time when you go to sleep | loc: Schlafenszeit
  EN TS: Bedtime for a boy and a cat!
  de TS: Schlafenszeit für einen Jungen und eine Katze!
  EN FS: Bedtime for a boy and a dog!
  de FS: Schlafenszeit für einen Jungen und einen Hund!
  EN TP: bedtime under a blanket
  de TP: Schlafenszeit unter der Decke
  EN FP: bedtime story with a book
  de FP: Schlafenszeit mit Vorlesebuch
2511 | spark (noun): a tiny glowing bit of fire in the air | loc: Funke
  EN TS: Sparks are flying around them.
  de TS: Um sie herum fliegen Funken.
  EN FS: Leaves are flying around them.
  de FS: Um sie herum fliegen Blätter.
  EN TP: sparks around a couple
  de TP: Funken um ein Paar
  EN FP: a spark from a plug
  de FP: ein Funke aus der Steckdose
2512 | coloring book (noun): a set of outline pictures for kids to paint in | loc: Malbuch
  EN TS: This coloring book needs you.
  de TS: Dieses Malbuch braucht dich.
  EN FS: This photo book needs you.
  de FS: Dieses Fotobuch braucht dich.
  EN TP: a coloring book page
  de TP: eine Seite im Malbuch
  EN FP: a coloring book cover
  de FP: das Cover eines Malbuchs
2514 | herbs (noun): leafy plants used in cooking, tea or medicine | loc: Kräuter
  EN TS: She's adding herbs to a bowl.
  de TS: Sie gibt Kräuter in eine Schüssel.
  EN FS: She's adding salt to a bowl.
  de FS: Sie gibt Salz in eine Schüssel.
  EN TP: sprinkling dried herbs
  de TP: getrocknete Kräuter streuen
  EN FP: chopping fresh herbs
  de FP: frische Kräuter hacken
2516 | year (noun): a period of twelve months | loc: Jahr
  EN TS: The year is 2024.
  de TS: Wir haben das Jahr 2024.
  EN FS: The year is 2025.
  de FS: Wir haben das Jahr 2025.
  EN TP: the year 2024 glowing
  de TP: das Jahr 2024 leuchtet
  EN FP: the year 2025
  de FP: das Jahr 2025
2519 | backyard (noun): the private grassy area behind a house | loc: Hinterhof
  EN TS: Did you see this backyard? A flamingo!
  de TS: Hast du diesen Hinterhof gesehen? Ein Flamingo!
  EN FS: Did you see this backyard? A swing!
  de FS: Hast du diesen Hinterhof gesehen? Eine Schaukel!
  EN TP: a busy little backyard
  de TP: ein belebter kleiner Hinterhof
  EN FP: a backyard vegetable patch
  de FP: ein Gemüsebeet im Hinterhof
2520 | sacred (adjective): holy and connected to religion | loc: heilig
  EN TS: A sacred light from above!
  de TS: Ein heiliges Licht von oben!
  EN FS: A sacred light from below!
  de FS: Ein heiliges Licht von unten!
  EN TP: a sacred beam of light
  de TP: ein heiliger Lichtstrahl
  EN FP: a sacred river
  de FP: ein heiliger Fluss
2522 | clover (noun): a small plant with round leaves, a lucky sign | loc: Klee
  EN TS: The clovers have four leaves.
  de TS: Der Klee hat vier Blätter.
  EN FS: The clovers have three leaves.
  de FS: Der Klee hat drei Blätter.
  EN TP: four-leaf clovers
  de TP: vierblättriger Klee
  EN FP: a clover field with cows
  de FP: eine Kleewiese mit Kühen
2523 | snowfall (noun): snow coming down from the sky | loc: Schneefall
  EN TS: The snowfall is heavy tonight.
  de TS: Der Schneefall ist heute Nacht heftig.
  EN FS: The rainfall is heavy tonight.
  de FS: Der Regen ist heute Nacht heftig.
  EN TP: heavy snowfall over a village
  de TP: heftiger Schneefall über einem Dorf
  EN FP: light snowfall in a city
  de FP: leichter Schneefall in der Stadt
2524 | walking stick (noun): a stick you lean on to help you walk | loc: der Gehstock
  EN TS: He has a walking stick.
  de TS: Er hat einen Gehstock.
  EN FS: He has a big umbrella.
  de FS: Er hat einen großen Regenschirm.
  EN TP: leaning on a walking stick
  de TP: sich auf einen Gehstock stützen
  EN FP: a walking stick for hiking
  de FP: ein Gehstock zum Wandern
2525 | lift (verb): to take hold of something and move it | loc: heben
  EN TS: Mum is lifting her baby bear.
  de TS: Mama hebt ihr Bärenbaby hoch.
  EN FS: Mum is lifting her baby fox.
  de FS: Mama hebt ihr Fuchsbaby hoch.
  EN TP: to lift the cub up
  de TP: das Junge hochheben
  EN FP: to lift a heavy box
  de FP: eine schwere Kiste heben
2526 | poseidon (noun): the ancient Greek god of the sea | loc: Poseidon
  EN TS: Poseidon has two spears.
  de TS: Poseidon hat zwei Speere.
  EN FS: Poseidon has two swords.
  de FS: Poseidon hat zwei Schwerter.
  EN TP: Poseidon rising from waves
  de TP: Poseidon steigt aus den Wellen
  EN FP: Poseidon sinking a ship
  de FP: Poseidon versenkt ein Schiff
2527 | gas mask (noun): a mask that protects your face from dangerous air | loc: Gasmaske
  EN TS: The DJ wears a gas mask. Why?
  de TS: Der DJ trägt eine Gasmaske. Warum?
  EN FS: The DJ wears a ski mask. Why?
  de FS: Der DJ trägt eine Skimaske. Warum?
  EN TP: gas mask and headphones
  de TP: Gasmaske und Kopfhörer
  EN FP: gas mask and goggles
  de FP: Gasmaske und Schutzbrille
2528 | top hat (noun): a tall formal hat with a flat top | loc: Zylinder
  EN TS: A purple top hat? Bold choice.
  de TS: Ein lila Zylinder? Mutige Wahl.
  EN FS: A black top hat? Bold choice.
  de FS: Ein schwarzer Zylinder? Mutige Wahl.
  EN TP: a shiny purple top hat
  de TP: ein glänzender lila Zylinder
  EN FP: a magician's top hat
  de FP: der Zylinder eines Zauberers
2529 | gentle (adjective): kind, calm and soft in the way you act | loc: sanft
  EN TS: He has a gentle face.
  de TS: Er hat ein sanftes Gesicht.
  EN FS: He has a gentle dog.
  de FS: Er hat einen sanften Hund.
  EN TP: a gentle calm face
  de TP: ein sanftes, ruhiges Gesicht
  EN FP: a gentle calm sea
  de FP: ein sanftes, ruhiges Meer
2530 | candlelight (noun): the warm light of a burning candle | loc: Kerzenschein
  EN TS: Candlelight glows among roses.
  de TS: Kerzenschein leuchtet zwischen Rosen.
  EN FS: Candlelight glows among books.
  de FS: Kerzenschein leuchtet zwischen Büchern.
  EN TP: candlelight in a lantern
  de TP: Kerzenschein in einer Laterne
  EN FP: candlelight on a cake
  de FP: Kerzenschein auf einer Torte
2531 | sparkle (verb): to shine with many small flashing points | loc: funkeln
  EN TS: Even the sky sparkles for them.
  de TS: Sogar der Himmel funkelt für sie.
  EN FS: Even the sea sparkles for them.
  de FS: Sogar das Meer funkelt für sie.
  EN TP: a sparkling night sky
  de TP: ein funkelnder Nachthimmel
  EN FP: sparkling water in a glass
  de FP: funkelndes Wasser im Glas
2532 | ruffle (noun): a strip of frilly fabric used as trim | loc: Rüsche
  EN TS: Her dress has grey ruffles.
  de TS: Ihr Kleid hat graue Rüschen.
  EN FS: Her dress has red ruffles.
  de FS: Ihr Kleid hat rote Rüschen.
  EN TP: a dress with grey ruffles
  de TP: ein Kleid mit grauen Rüschen
  EN FP: ruffles on a red hat
  de FP: Rüschen an einem roten Hut
2533 | misty (adjective): covered in thin fog that hides things | loc: neblig
  EN TS: The far end is misty.
  de TS: Das hintere Ende ist neblig.
  EN FS: The far end is sunny.
  de FS: Das hintere Ende ist sonnig.
  EN TP: a misty old street
  de TP: eine neblige alte Straße
  EN FP: a misty mountain lake
  de FP: ein nebliger Bergsee
2536 | chimpanzee (noun): a large clever African ape with dark hair | loc: Schimpanse
  EN TS: This chimpanzee looks like a serious biker.
  de TS: Dieser Schimpanse sieht aus wie ein ernster Biker.
  EN FS: This chimpanzee looks like a serious surfer.
  de FS: Dieser Schimpanse sieht aus wie ein ernster Surfer.
  EN TP: a chimpanzee on a motorbike
  de TP: ein Schimpanse auf einem Motorrad
  EN FP: a chimpanzee in a tree
  de FP: ein Schimpanse auf einem Baum
2537 | bedtime story (noun): a story read to children before sleep | loc: Gutenachtgeschichte
  EN TS: The girl is reading a bedtime story.
  de TS: Das Mädchen liest eine Gutenachtgeschichte.
  EN FS: The boy is reading a bedtime story.
  de FS: Der Junge liest eine Gutenachtgeschichte.
  EN TP: a bedtime story in bed
  de TP: eine Gutenachtgeschichte im Bett
  EN FP: a bedtime story on TV
  de FP: eine Gutenachtgeschichte im Fernsehen
2538 | little red riding hood (noun): the fairy-tale girl in a red hooded cloak | loc: Rotkäppchen
  EN TS: Little Red Riding Hood trusts the wolf.
  de TS: Rotkäppchen vertraut dem Wolf.
  EN FS: Little Red Riding Hood trusts the bear.
  de FS: Rotkäppchen vertraut dem Bären.
  EN TP: Little Red Riding Hood's wolf
  de TP: Rotkäppchens Wolf
  EN FP: Little Red Riding Hood's gran
  de FP: Rotkäppchens Oma
2539 | artificial intelligence (noun): computer systems that think and learn | loc: künstliche Intelligenz
  EN TS: Artificial intelligence lives in her head.
  de TS: Künstliche Intelligenz lebt in ihrem Kopf.
  EN FS: Artificial intelligence lives in her car.
  de FS: Künstliche Intelligenz lebt in ihrem Auto.
  EN TP: artificial intelligence robot
  de TP: ein Roboter mit künstlicher Intelligenz
  EN FP: artificial intelligence app
  de FP: eine App mit künstlicher Intelligenz
2540 | dungeon (noun): a dark prison under a castle | loc: Verlies
  EN TS: What a "cosy" dungeon.
  de TS: Was für ein „gemütliches“ Verlies.
  EN FS: What a "cosy" garden.
  de FS: Was für ein „gemütlicher“ Garten.
  EN TP: a dark dungeon with candles
  de TP: ein dunkles Verlies mit Kerzen
  EN FP: a dark cellar with wine
  de FP: ein dunkler Keller mit Wein
2541 | staircase (noun): a set of stairs inside a building | loc: Treppenhaus
  EN TS: Nobody cleaned this staircase.
  de TS: Keiner hat dieses Treppenhaus geputzt.
  EN FS: Nobody cleaned this kitchen.
  de FS: Keiner hat diese Küche geputzt.
  EN TP: a crumbling stone staircase
  de TP: ein bröckelndes Treppenhaus aus Stein
  EN FP: a crumbling stone bridge
  de FP: eine bröckelnde Brücke aus Stein
2543 | tusk (noun): one of the two long teeth of an elephant | loc: der Stoßzahn
  EN TS: The elephant has long tusks.
  de TS: Der Elefant hat lange Stoßzähne.
  EN FS: The elephant has short tusks.
  de FS: Der Elefant hat kurze Stoßzähne.
  EN TP: two long white tusks
  de TP: zwei lange weiße Stoßzähne
  EN FP: a walrus with tusks
  de FP: ein Walross mit Stoßzähnen
2544 | hanuman (noun): the Hindu monkey god with a crown and mace | loc: Hanuman
  EN TS: Hanuman has a golden crown.
  de TS: Hanuman hat eine goldene Krone.
  EN FS: Hanuman has a silver crown.
  de FS: Hanuman hat eine silberne Krone.
  EN TP: Hanuman with a golden staff
  de TP: Hanuman mit goldenem Stab
  EN FP: Hanuman with a sword
  de FP: Hanuman mit Schwert
2545 | worship (verb): to show deep love and respect to a god | loc: anbeten | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The monkey is worshipping.
  de TS: Der Affe betet seinen Gott an.
  EN FS: The monkey is sleeping.
  de FS: Der Affe schläft.
  EN TP: worshipping on stone steps
  de TP: auf Steinstufen einen Gott anbeten
  EN FP: worshipping a football star
  de FP: einen Fußballstar anbeten
2546 | spacious (adjective): having a lot of open room inside | loc: geräumig
  EN TS: This hall is "quite" spacious.
  de TS: Diese Halle ist „ziemlich“ geräumig.
  EN FS: This hall is "quite" tiny.
  de FS: Diese Halle ist „ziemlich“ winzig.
  EN TP: a spacious hall
  de TP: eine geräumige Halle
  EN FP: a spacious car
  de FP: ein geräumiges Auto
2547 | toadstool (noun): a mushroom with a red cap and white spots | loc: Fliegenpilz
  EN TS: These toadstools are massive!
  de TS: Diese Fliegenpilze sind gigantisch!
  EN FS: These toadstools are tiny!
  de FS: Diese Fliegenpilze sind winzig!
  EN TP: giant red toadstools
  de TP: riesige rote Fliegenpilze
  EN FP: toadstools in a basket
  de FP: Fliegenpilze im Korb
2548 | barrel (noun): a big round wooden container | loc: Fass | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: So many barrels. Beer, maybe?
  de TS: So viele Fässer. Vielleicht Bier?
  EN FS: So many bikes. Beer, maybe?
  de FS: So viele Fahrräder. Vielleicht Bier?
  EN TP: stacked wooden barrels
  de TP: gestapelte Fässer aus Holz
  EN FP: a barrel of cold beer
  de FP: ein Fass kaltes Bier
2549 | father (noun): a male parent | loc: Vater
  EN TS: Father and son are cheering!
  de TS: Vater und Sohn jubeln!
  EN FS: Father and son are crying!
  de FS: Vater und Sohn weinen!
  EN TP: a father carrying his son
  de TP: ein Vater trägt seinen Sohn
  EN FP: a father carrying shopping
  de FP: ein Vater trägt Einkäufe
2550 | cross-legged (adverb): sitting with your legs bent and crossed | loc: im Schneidersitz
  EN TS: She sits cross-legged, barefoot.
  de TS: Sie sitzt im Schneidersitz, barfuß.
  EN FS: She sits cross-legged in boots.
  de FS: Sie sitzt im Schneidersitz, in Stiefeln.
  EN TP: sitting cross-legged
  de TP: im Schneidersitz sitzen
  EN FP: standing cross-legged
  de FP: im Schneidersitz stehen
2551 | miami (noun): the Florida beach city of neon and palms | loc: Miami
  EN TS: Miami vibes: palms and neon.
  de TS: Miami-Vibes: Palmen und Neon.
  EN FS: Miami vibes: snow and neon.
  de FS: Miami-Vibes: Schnee und Neon.
  EN TP: a neon Miami street
  de TP: eine Neonstraße in Miami
  EN FP: a Miami beach at noon
  de FP: ein Strand in Miami am Mittag
2552 | virtual reality (noun): a computer world seen through special goggles | loc: die virtuelle Realität
  EN TS: She is in virtual reality.
  de TS: Sie ist in der virtuellen Realität.
  EN FS: She is in a swimming pool.
  de FS: Sie ist in einem Schwimmbad.
  EN TP: a virtual reality headset
  de TP: eine Brille für virtuelle Realität
  EN FP: virtual reality at school
  de FP: virtuelle Realität in der Schule
2556 | brain (noun): the organ in the head we think with | loc: Gehirn
  EN TS: Fact: the brain is glowing.
  de TS: Fakt: Das Gehirn leuchtet.
  EN FS: Fact: the heart is glowing.
  de FS: Fakt: Das Herz leuchtet.
  EN TP: a glowing brain
  de TP: ein leuchtendes Gehirn
  EN FP: a brain in a jar
  de FP: ein Gehirn im Glas
2557 | sailboat (noun): a small boat pushed along by the wind | loc: Segelboot
  EN TS: Wait, the sailboat is glass?
  de TS: Moment, das Segelboot ist aus Glas?
  EN FS: Wait, the sailboat is wood?
  de FS: Moment, das Segelboot ist aus Holz?
  EN TP: a glass sailboat
  de TP: ein Segelboot aus Glas
  EN FP: a sailboat in a bottle
  de FP: ein Segelboot in der Flasche
2558 | freedom (noun): the feeling of being free and held by nothing | loc: Freiheit
  EN TS: She is flying. Pure freedom!
  de TS: Sie fliegt. Pure Freiheit!
  EN FS: She is swimming. Pure freedom!
  de FS: Sie schwimmt. Pure Freiheit!
  EN TP: freedom above the sea
  de TP: Freiheit über dem Meer
  EN FP: freedom under the sea
  de FP: Freiheit unter dem Meer
2559 | coin (noun): a flat metal piece used as money | loc: Münze
  EN TS: This tree grows coins!
  de TS: An diesem Baum wachsen Münzen!
  EN FS: This tree grows apples!
  de FS: An diesem Baum wachsen Äpfel!
  EN TP: coins falling from a tree
  de TP: Münzen fallen vom Baum
  EN FP: coins in a piggy bank
  de FP: Münzen im Sparschwein
2560 | miracle (noun): an amazing event that cannot be explained | loc: Wunder
  EN TS: Walking on water? A miracle!
  de TS: Übers Wasser laufen? Ein Wunder!
  EN FS: Walking on fire? A miracle!
  de FS: Übers Feuer laufen? Ein Wunder!
  EN TP: a miracle on the ocean
  de TP: ein Wunder auf dem Ozean
  EN FP: a miracle cure for colds
  de FP: ein Wundermittel gegen Erkältung
2562 | detective (noun): a person whose job is to solve crimes | loc: Detektiv
  EN TS: Rainy night, lonely detective.
  de TS: Regnerische Nacht, einsamer Detektiv.
  EN FS: Sunny day, lonely detective.
  de FS: Sonniger Tag, einsamer Detektiv.
  EN TP: a detective in the rain
  de TP: ein Detektiv im Regen
  EN FP: a crime scene detective
  de FP: ein Detektiv am Tatort
2563 | merchant (noun): a person who buys and sells goods | loc: Kaufmann
  EN TS: A merchant is checking grain.
  de TS: Ein Kaufmann prüft Getreide.
  EN FS: A merchant is checking coins.
  de FS: Ein Kaufmann prüft Münzen.
  EN TP: a merchant by candlelight
  de TP: ein Kaufmann bei Kerzenschein
  EN FP: a merchant at the market
  de FP: ein Kaufmann auf dem Markt
2564 | hydrangea (noun): a garden plant with round clusters of flowers | loc: Hortensie
  EN TS: This hydrangea cluster is blue.
  de TS: Diese Hortensienblüte ist blau.
  EN FS: This hydrangea cluster is pink.
  de FS: Diese Hortensienblüte ist rosa.
  EN TP: a blue hydrangea cluster
  de TP: eine blaue Hortensienblüte
  EN FP: a hydrangea in a vase
  de FP: eine Hortensie in einer Vase
2567 | saint (noun): a very holy person honoured in religion | loc: Heiliger | translator note: veil implies a female saint: Heilige (feminine of loc Heiliger)
  EN TS: The saint wears a white veil.
  de TS: Die Heilige trägt einen weißen Schleier.
  EN FS: The saint wears a red veil.
  de FS: Die Heilige trägt einen roten Schleier.
  EN TP: a saint with a halo
  de TP: eine Heilige mit Heiligenschein
  EN FP: a saint on a horse
  de FP: ein Heiliger auf einem Pferd
2571 | grumpy (adjective): in a bad mood and easily annoyed | loc: mürrisch
  EN TS: The boy is grumpy. Again.
  de TS: Der Junge ist mürrisch. Mal wieder.
  EN FS: The girl is grumpy. Again.
  de FS: Das Mädchen ist mürrisch. Mal wieder.
  EN TP: a grumpy little boy
  de TP: ein mürrischer kleiner Junge
  EN FP: a grumpy old man
  de FP: ein mürrischer alter Mann
2572 | triangle (noun): a flat shape with three straight sides | loc: Dreieck
  EN TS: The triangles are glowing.
  de TS: Die Dreiecke leuchten.
  EN FS: The circles are glowing.
  de FS: Die Kreise leuchten.
  EN TP: glowing neon triangles
  de TP: leuchtende Neon-Dreiecke
  EN FP: a triangle road sign
  de FP: ein dreieckiges Verkehrsschild
2575 | anonymous (adjective): with the name and face kept hidden | loc: anonym
  EN TS: The DJ is totally anonymous.
  de TS: Der DJ ist komplett anonym.
  EN FS: The chef is totally anonymous.
  de FS: Der Koch ist komplett anonym.
  EN TP: an anonymous hooded DJ
  de TP: ein anonymer DJ mit Kapuze
  EN FP: an anonymous letter
  de FP: ein anonymer Brief
2576 | heartbroken (adjective): extremely sad after losing someone you love | loc: untröstlich
  EN TS: He is heartbroken in Paris.
  de TS: Er ist untröstlich in Paris.
  EN FS: He is heartbroken in Rome.
  de FS: Er ist untröstlich in Rom.
  EN TP: heartbroken in the rain
  de TP: untröstlich im Regen
  EN FP: heartbroken in the snow
  de FP: untröstlich im Schnee
2578 | visor (noun): the clear front part of a helmet | loc: das Visier | translator note: FP pun "cap with a visor" = Schirm in German
  EN TS: The visor is like a mirror.
  de TS: Das Visier ist wie ein Spiegel.
  EN FS: The visor is like a window.
  de FS: Das Visier ist wie ein Fenster.
  EN TP: a mirrored helmet visor
  de TP: ein verspiegeltes Visier
  EN FP: a cap with a visor
  de FP: eine Kappe mit Schirm
2579 | weird (adjective): strange and not normal | loc: seltsam
  EN TS: Her glasses are super weird.
  de TS: Ihre Brille ist mega seltsam.
  EN FS: Her hat is super weird.
  de FS: Ihr Hut ist mega seltsam.
  EN TP: a weird retro machine
  de TP: eine seltsame Retro-Maschine
  EN FP: a weird old car
  de FP: ein seltsames altes Auto
2580 | archer (noun): a person who shoots with a bow and arrow | loc: Bogenschütze
  EN TS: The archer is drawing his bow.
  de TS: Der Bogenschütze spannt seinen Bogen.
  EN FS: The archer is drawing a sword.
  de FS: Der Bogenschütze zieht ein Schwert.
  EN TP: a statue of an archer
  de TP: die Statue eines Bogenschützen
  EN FP: a painting of an archer
  de FP: das Gemälde eines Bogenschützen
2581 | flute (noun): a long thin instrument you blow across | loc: Flöte
  EN TS: He is playing a bamboo flute.
  de TS: Er spielt eine Bambusflöte.
  EN FS: He is playing a bamboo drum.
  de FS: Er spielt eine Bambustrommel.
  EN TP: playing a bamboo flute
  de TP: eine Bambusflöte spielen
  EN FP: carving a bamboo flute
  de FP: eine Bambusflöte schnitzen
2583 | enjoy (verb): to get pleasure from something | loc: genießen
  EN TS: She is enjoying the vibes.
  de TS: Sie genießt die Vibes.
  EN FS: She is enjoying the pizza.
  de FS: Sie genießt die Pizza.
  EN TP: enjoying the music
  de TP: die Musik genießen
  EN FP: enjoying the sun
  de FP: die Sonne genießen
2584 | baptism (noun): a religious ceremony using water | loc: Taufe
  EN TS: It's a baptism in a river.
  de TS: Das ist eine Taufe im Fluss.
  EN FS: It's a baptism in a church.
  de FS: Das ist eine Taufe in der Kirche.
  EN TP: a baptism in the river
  de TP: eine Taufe im Fluss
  EN FP: a church baptism
  de FP: eine Taufe in der Kirche
2586 | friendship (noun): the bond between friends who care for each other | loc: Freundschaft
  EN TS: Best friendship ever: a giant robot and a little girl.
  de TS: Beste Freundschaft ever: ein Riesenroboter und ein kleines Mädchen.
  EN FS: Best friendship ever: a giant dog and a little girl.
  de FS: Beste Freundschaft ever: ein Riesenhund und ein kleines Mädchen.
  EN TP: an unlikely friendship
  de TP: eine ungewöhnliche Freundschaft
  EN FP: a friendship bracelet
  de FP: ein Freundschaftsarmband
2594 | learn (verb): to get new knowledge or skills | loc: lernen
  EN TS: The robot is learning about itself.
  de TS: Der Roboter lernt etwas über sich selbst.
  EN FS: The robot is learning about cats.
  de FS: Der Roboter lernt etwas über Katzen.
  EN TP: a robot learning to read
  de TP: ein Roboter lernt lesen
  EN FP: a robot learning to fly
  de FP: ein Roboter lernt fliegen
2595 | grand piano (noun): a large piano with a big lid that opens up | loc: Flügel
  EN TS: Someone left a grand piano outside.
  de TS: Jemand hat einen Flügel draußen stehen lassen.
  EN FS: Someone left a grand piano inside.
  de FS: Jemand hat einen Flügel drinnen stehen lassen.
  EN TP: a grand piano outside
  de TP: ein Flügel im Freien
  EN FP: a grand piano inside
  de FP: ein Flügel im Haus
2600 | beetle (noun): an insect with a hard shiny back | loc: Käfer
  EN TS: Bro, two beetles are chilling.
  de TS: Bro, zwei Käfer chillen.
  EN FS: Bro, two snails are chilling.
  de FS: Bro, zwei Schnecken chillen.
  EN TP: beetles crawling on leaves
  de TP: Käfer krabbeln über Blätter
  EN FP: beetles flying over flowers
  de FP: Käfer fliegen über Blumen
2601 | kneel (verb): to go down and rest on your knees | loc: knien
  EN TS: The man is kneeling in prayer.
  de TS: Der Mann kniet im Gebet.
  EN FS: The man is sitting in prayer.
  de FS: Der Mann sitzt im Gebet.
  EN TP: kneeling on stone ground
  de TP: auf Steinboden knien
  EN FP: kneeling on a soft sofa
  de FP: auf einem weichen Sofa knien
2602 | ski (verb): to slide over snow on long narrow boards | loc: Ski fahren
  EN TS: They are skiing down so fast.
  de TS: Sie fahren mega schnell Ski bergab.
  EN FS: They are skiing up so fast.
  de FS: Sie fahren mega schnell Ski bergauf.
  EN TP: skiing down a steep slope
  de TP: einen steilen Hang hinunter Ski fahren
  EN FP: skiing on a flat road
  de FP: auf einer flachen Straße Ski fahren
2603 | sheet music (noun): printed paper with the notes of a piece | loc: Notenblatt
  EN TS: The sheet music is handwritten.
  de TS: Das Notenblatt ist handgeschrieben.
  EN FS: The sheet music is printed out.
  de FS: Das Notenblatt ist ausgedruckt.
  EN TP: old handwritten sheet music
  de TP: ein altes handgeschriebenes Notenblatt
  EN FP: new printed sheet music
  de FP: ein neues gedrucktes Notenblatt
2604 | lifeless (adjective): dead-looking, with no life or leaves | loc: leblos
  EN TS: A lifeless tree, a green moon.
  de TS: Ein lebloser Baum, ein grüner Mond.
  EN FS: A lifeless tree, a white moon.
  de FS: Ein lebloser Baum, ein weißer Mond.
  EN TP: a lifeless tree on rocks
  de TP: ein lebloser Baum auf Felsen
  EN FP: a lifeless potted tree
  de FP: ein lebloser Baum im Topf
2605 | cradle (verb): to hold someone gently in your arms | loc: in den Armen wiegen
  EN TS: He is cradling a baby.
  de TS: Er wiegt ein Baby in den Armen.
  EN FS: He is cradling a lamb.
  de FS: Er wiegt ein Lamm in den Armen.
  EN TP: to cradle a baby
  de TP: ein Baby in den Armen wiegen
  EN FP: to cradle a phone
  de FP: ein Handy in den Armen wiegen
2606 | clockwork (noun): machinery of gears and springs inside a clock | loc: Uhrwerk
  EN TS: Her head is pure clockwork.
  de TS: Ihr Kopf ist pures Uhrwerk.
  EN FS: Her head is pure glass.
  de FS: Ihr Kopf ist pures Glas.
  EN TP: a head full of clockwork
  de TP: ein Kopf voller Uhrwerk
  EN FP: a clockwork toy mouse
  de FP: eine Spielzeugmaus mit Uhrwerk
2607 | wear (verb): to be dressed in something | loc: tragen
  EN TS: The cats wear formal coats.
  de TS: Die Katzen tragen elegante Mäntel.
  EN FS: The dogs wear formal coats.
  de FS: Die Hunde tragen elegante Mäntel.
  EN TP: cats wearing long coats
  de TP: Katzen tragen lange Mäntel
  EN FP: cats wearing collars
  de FP: Katzen tragen Halsbänder
2611 | buckle (noun): the metal fastener that closes a belt | loc: Schnalle
  EN TS: His belt has a metal buckle.
  de TS: Sein Gürtel hat eine Schnalle aus Metall.
  EN FS: His bag has a metal buckle.
  de FS: Seine Tasche hat eine Schnalle aus Metall.
  EN TP: a metal belt buckle
  de TP: eine Gürtelschnalle aus Metall
  EN FP: buckling a seatbelt
  de FP: einen Sicherheitsgurt anlegen
2612 | bud (noun): a flower that has not opened yet | loc: Knospe
  EN TS: Two buds have not opened yet.
  de TS: Zwei Knospen sind noch nicht aufgegangen.
  EN FS: Two buds have opened already.
  de FS: Zwei Knospen sind schon aufgegangen.
  EN TP: two closed red buds
  de TP: zwei geschlossene rote Knospen
  EN FP: two open red buds
  de FP: zwei offene rote Knospen
2614 | minaret (noun): the tall thin tower of a mosque | loc: Minarett
  EN TS: Two boys are near a minaret.
  de TS: Zwei Jungen sind in der Nähe eines Minaretts.
  EN FS: Two girls are near a minaret.
  de FS: Zwei Mädchen sind in der Nähe eines Minaretts.
  EN TP: walking toward a minaret
  de TP: auf ein Minarett zugehen
  EN FP: climbing up a minaret
  de FP: auf ein Minarett klettern
2618 | handwriting (noun): words written by hand, not printed | loc: Handschrift
  EN TS: The handwriting is in cursive.
  de TS: Die Handschrift ist in Schreibschrift.
  EN FS: The handwriting is in print.
  de FS: Die Handschrift ist in Druckschrift.
  EN TP: faded cursive handwriting
  de TP: eine verblasste Handschrift
  EN FP: neat printed handwriting
  de FP: eine ordentliche Druckschrift
2621 | mast (noun): the tall pole that stands up from a deck | loc: Mast
  EN TS: The mast has lots of rigging.
  de TS: Der Mast hat viel Takelage.
  EN FS: The mast has lots of flags.
  de FS: Der Mast hat viele Flaggen.
  EN TP: a tall mast with rigging
  de TP: ein hoher Mast mit Takelage
  EN FP: a mast with pirate flags
  de FP: ein Mast mit Piratenflaggen
2622 | statue of liberty (noun): a green statue of a woman holding a torch | loc: Freiheitsstatue
  EN TS: A tiny Statue of Liberty!
  de TS: Eine winzige Freiheitsstatue!
  EN FS: A tiny Eiffel Tower!
  de FS: Ein winziger Eiffelturm!
  EN TP: a mini Statue of Liberty
  de TP: eine Mini-Freiheitsstatue
  EN FP: a Statue of Liberty costume
  de FP: ein Freiheitsstatuen-Kostüm
2623 | ivy (noun): a green plant that climbs walls and trees | loc: Efeu
  EN TS: Ivy covers the bookshelf.
  de TS: Efeu bedeckt das Bücherregal.
  EN FS: Snow covers the bookshelf.
  de FS: Schnee bedeckt das Bücherregal.
  EN TP: a bookshelf covered in ivy
  de TP: ein Bücherregal voller Efeu
  EN FP: a castle covered in ivy
  de FP: eine Burg voller Efeu
2625 | engineer (noun): a person who plans and builds machines | loc: Ingenieur
  EN TS: The engineer dreams of cranes.
  de TS: Der Ingenieur träumt von Kränen.
  EN FS: The engineer dreams of horses.
  de FS: Der Ingenieur träumt von Pferden.
  EN TP: an engineer's hard hat
  de TP: der Schutzhelm eines Ingenieurs
  EN FP: an engineer at a computer
  de FP: ein Ingenieur am Computer
2626 | bald (adjective): having no hair on the head | loc: kahl
  EN TS: A city lives in his bald head.
  de TS: Eine Stadt lebt in seinem kahlen Kopf.
  EN FS: A farm lives in his bald head.
  de FS: Ein Bauernhof lebt in seinem kahlen Kopf.
  EN TP: a bald head in profile
  de TP: ein kahler Kopf im Profil
  EN FP: a bald head with glasses
  de FP: ein kahler Kopf mit Brille
2629 | pigtails (noun): hair tied in two bunches, one each side | loc: Zöpfe
  EN TS: Her hair is in two pigtails.
  de TS: Ihr Haar ist zu zwei Zöpfen gebunden.
  EN FS: Her hair is in two buns.
  de FS: Ihr Haar ist zu zwei Dutts gebunden.
  EN TP: two long braided pigtails
  de TP: zwei lange geflochtene Zöpfe
  EN FP: two short curly pigtails
  de FP: zwei kurze lockige Zöpfe
2631 | lens (noun): the round glass in glasses or a camera | loc: Linse
  EN TS: Her goggles have round lenses.
  de TS: Ihre Schutzbrille hat runde Linsen.
  EN FS: Her goggles have no lenses.
  de FS: Ihre Schutzbrille hat keine Linsen.
  EN TP: round tinted lenses
  de TP: runde getönte Linsen
  EN FP: a lens on a camera
  de FP: eine Linse an einer Kamera
2633 | beam (noun): a line of light shining from something | loc: Strahl | translator note: FP pun "wooden beams" = Balken, not Strahl
  EN TS: That tree is a disco. Look at the beams!
  de TS: Der Baum ist eine Disco. Schau dir die Strahlen an!
  EN FS: That tree is a disco. Look at the birds!
  de FS: Der Baum ist eine Disco. Schau dir die Vögel an!
  EN TP: beams of coloured light
  de TP: Strahlen aus buntem Licht
  EN FP: wooden beams of a roof
  de FP: Holzbalken eines Dachs
2634 | cork (noun): the round plug that closes a bottle neck | loc: Korken
  EN TS: Every bottle has a cork.
  de TS: Jede Flasche hat einen Korken.
  EN FS: Every bottle has a straw.
  de FS: Jede Flasche hat einen Strohhalm.
  EN TP: bottles closed with corks
  de TP: mit Korken verschlossene Flaschen
  EN FP: a cork board with notes
  de FP: eine Korkpinnwand mit Zetteln
2635 | magnolia (noun): a big cup-shaped flower that grows on a tree | loc: Magnolie
  EN TS: The magnolia is creamy white.
  de TS: Die Magnolie ist cremeweiß.
  EN FS: The magnolia is bright yellow.
  de FS: Die Magnolie ist knallgelb.
  EN TP: an open magnolia flower
  de TP: eine offene Magnolienblüte
  EN FP: a magnolia tree
  de FP: ein Magnolienbaum
2641 | ray (noun): a narrow line of light from a bright source | loc: Strahl
  EN TS: Rays are filling the sky!
  de TS: Strahlen erfüllen den Himmel!
  EN FS: Rays are filling the room!
  de FS: Strahlen erfüllen den Raum!
  EN TP: golden rays of light
  de TP: goldene Lichtstrahlen
  EN FP: rays through a window
  de FP: Strahlen durch ein Fenster
2648 | ant (noun): a tiny insect that lives in large groups | loc: Ameise
  EN TS: This ant is bigger than me!
  de TS: Diese Ameise ist größer als ich!
  EN FS: This bee is bigger than me!
  de FS: Diese Biene ist größer als ich!
  EN TP: a huge black ant
  de TP: eine riesige schwarze Ameise
  EN FP: a huge ant hill
  de FP: ein riesiger Ameisenhaufen
2649 | goggles (noun): big glasses with a band that cover your eyes | loc: Schutzbrille
  EN TS: Those goggles are massive!
  de TS: Diese Schutzbrille ist riesig!
  EN FS: Those earrings are massive!
  de FS: Diese Ohrringe sind riesig!
  EN TP: glowing goggles on her eyes
  de TP: eine leuchtende Schutzbrille
  EN FP: goggles for swimming
  de FP: eine Schwimmbrille
2651 | spots (noun): small round marks on a surface | loc: Punkte
  EN TS: The red roof has white spots.
  de TS: Das rote Dach hat weiße Punkte.
  EN FS: The red roof has black spots.
  de FS: Das rote Dach hat schwarze Punkte.
  EN TP: a cap with white spots
  de TP: eine Kappe mit weißen Punkten
  EN FP: a dog with white spots
  de FP: ein Hund mit weißen Punkten
